FR940216-2-00036 FR940216-2-00023 NUCLEAR REGULATORY COMMISSION Biweekly Notice Applications and Amendments to Facility Operating Licenses Involving No Significant Hazards Considerations I. Background Pursuant to Public Law 97-415, the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission (the Commission or NRC staff) is publishing this regular biweekly notice. Public Law 97-415 revised section 189 of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act), to require the Commission to publish notice of any amendments issued, or proposed to be issued, under a new provision of section 189 of the Act. This provision grants the Commission the authority to issue and make immediately effective any amendment to an operating license upon a determination by the Commission that such amendment involves no significant hazards consideration, notwithstanding the pendency before the Commission of a request for a hearing from any person. This biweekly notice includes all notices of amendments issued, or proposed to be issued from January 22, 1994, through February 4, 1994. The last biweekly notice was published on February 2, 1994 (59 FR 4933). Notice Of Consideration Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses, Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination, And Opportunity For A Hearing The Commission has made a proposed determination that the following amendment requests involve no significant hazards consideration. Under the Commission's regulations in 10 CFR 50.92, this means that operation of the facility in accordance with the proposed amendment would not (1) involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated; or (2) create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated; or (3) involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The basis for this proposed determination for each amendment request is shown below. The Commission is seeking public comments on this proposed determination. Any comments received within 30 days after the date of publication of this notice will be considered in making any final determination. Normally, the Commission will not issue the amendment until the expiration of the 30-day notice period. However, should circumstances change during the notice period such that failure to act in a timely way would result, for example, in derating or shutdown of the facility, the Commission may issue the license amendment before the expiration of the 30-day notice period, provided that its final determination is that the amendment involves no significant hazards consideration. The final determination will consider all public and State comments received before action is taken. Should the Commission take this action, it will publish in the Federal Register a notice of issuance and provide for opportunity for a hearing after issuance. The Commission expects that the need to take this action will occur very infrequently. Written comments may be submitted by mail to the Rules Review and Directives Branch, Division of Freedom of Information and Publications Services, Office of Administration, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, and should cite the publication date and page number of this Federal Register notice. Written comments may also be delivered to Room P-223, Phillips Building, 7920 Norfolk Avenue, Bethesda, Maryland from 7:30 a.m. to 4:15 p.m. Federal workdays. Copies of written comments received may be examined at the NRC Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555. The filing of requests for a hearing and petitions for leave to intervene is discussed below. By March 18, 1994, the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operating license and any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file a written request for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. Interested persons should consult a current copy of 10 CFR 2.714 which is available at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555 and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. If a request for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filed by the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designated by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition; and the Secretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a notice of a hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall set forth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding, and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding. The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention should be permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) the nature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to the proceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial, or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of any order which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest. The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subject matter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Any person who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has been admitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave of the Board up to 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfy the specificity requirements described above. Not later than 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to the petition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions which are sought to be litigated in the matter. Each contention must consist of a specific statement of the issue of law or fact to be raised or controverted. In addition, the petitioner shall provide a brief explanation of the bases of the contention and a concise statement of the alleged facts or expert opinion which support the contention and on which the petitioner intends to rely in proving the contention at the hearing. The petitioner must also provide references to those specific sources and documents of which the petitioner is aware and on which the petitioner intends to rely to establish those facts or expert opinion. Petitioner must provide sufficient information to show that a genuine dispute exists with the applicant on a material issue of law or fact. Contentions shall be limited to matters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. The contention must be one which, if proven, would entitle the petitioner to relief. A petitioner who fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirements with respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participate as a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subject to any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have the opportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, including the opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. If a hearing is requested, the Commission will make a final determination on the issue of no significant hazards consideration. The final determination will serve to decide when the hearing is held. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration, the Commission may issue the amendment and make it immediately effective, notwithstanding the request for a hearing. Any hearing held would take place after issuance of the amendment. If the final determination is that the amendment request involves a significant hazards consideration, any hearing held would take place before the issuance of any amendment. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filed with the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Services Branch, or may be delivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington DC 20555, by the above date. Where petitions are filed during the last 10 days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to Western Union at 1-(800) 248-5100 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700). The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number N1023 and the following message addressed to (Project Director): petitioner's name and telephone number, date petition was mailed, plant name, and publication date and page number of this Federal Register notice. A copy of the petition should also be sent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions, supplemental petitions and/or requests for a hearing will not be entertained absent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board that the petition and/or request should be granted based upon a balancing of factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). For further details with respect to this action, see the application for amendment which is available for public inspection at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. Commonwealth Edison Company, Docket Nos. 50-373 and 50-374, LaSalle County Station, Units 1 and 2, LaSalle County, Illinois Date of amendment request: January 24, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would implement Line Item 5.9 of NRC Generic Letter 93-05, ``Line Item Technical Specification Improvements to Reduce Surveillance Requirements for Testing During Power Operation,'' which recommends licensees consider deleting the requirements to perform response time testing for selected instrumentation in the isolation system where the required time corresponds to the diesel start time. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: LaSalle has evaluated the proposed Technical Specification Amendment. Based upon the criteria for defining a Significant Hazards Consideration established in 10 CFR 50.92(c), operation of LaSalle County Station in accordance with the proposed amendment will not: 1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated because: The proposal seeks to eliminate response time testing requirements for selected instrumentation in the isolation system. The proposal does not introduce changes in the response times themselves. The probability and consequences of an accident previously evaluated are not increased because accepted licensing criteria are maintained. The requirements for channel checks, functional tests, calibrations, and logic system functional tests are not altered by this proposal. The ability to detect degrading trends of response times is available via the above Technical Specification required tests. Therefore, the response times of these systems will be maintained within the acceptance limits assumed in plant safety analyses and required for successful mitigation of an initiating event because of the continued Technical Specification testing. 2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated because: The proposal does not change component or system interactions. Accident analyses assume a loss of AC power which is restored by startup of emergency diesel generators. The 13 second interval associated with the restoration of AC power, which establishes the response time for the isolation functions, is maintained. The starting, sequencing, and loading functions associated with the diesel generators is not affected by the proposed change. The response times include the instrument response times, which are typically measured in fractions of a second, and the response times of the actuation logic circuits, which are typically less than a second. These times are small in comparison to the diesel generator start time (13 seconds). The ability of the isolation system to perform its intended function to mitigate the consequences of an initiating event within the acceptance limits assumed in plant safety analyses is not altered by the proposed change. 3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety because: The proposal does not involve the relaxation of any criteria identified in the SAR or reduce any of the requirements of Technical Specifications. The proposed revision does not affect licensing acceptance limits associated with accidents. With the exception of MSIVs, the safety analyses do not address individual sensor response times or the response times of the logic systems to which the sensors are connected. These analyses conservatively establish the margin of safety. Deleting the requirement to perform unnecessary response time testing does not affect the results of accident and transient analyses. Plant and system response to an initiating event will remain in compliance within the assumptions of safety analyses. The proposed change does not increase the probability or consequences of an accident, and there is no impact on equipment important to safety or systems, structures or components. There is no associated change to the type, amount, or control of radioactive effluents, nor is there an associated increase in individual or cumulative occupational radiation exposure. There is no effect upon the capabilities of the associated systems to perform their intended functions within the allowed response times assumed in safety analyses. Therefore, the margin of safety is preserved. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Public Library of Illinois Valley Community College, Rural Route No. 1, Ogelsby, Illinois 61348 Attorney for licensee: Michael I. Miller, Esquire; Sidley and Austin, One First National Plaza, Chicago, Illinois 60690 NRC Project Director: James E. Dyer Connecticut Yankee Atomic Power Company, Docket No. 50-213, Haddam Neck Plant, Middlesex County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: January 17, 1994 Description of amendment request: Connecticut Yankee Atomic Power Company (CYAPCO) proposes to remove Technical Specification 3/4.4.12, ``Failed Fuel Rods'' and its associated BASES Section 3/4.4.12. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration (SHC), which is presented below: The proposed changes do not involve an SHC consideration because the changes would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. A review of the accidents detailed in the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report, Chapter 15, was undertaken to determine if they were impacted by the proposed change. The review indicated that the previously evaluated accidents were not impacted by the proposed license amendment. All fuel design and performance criteria are the same for Cycle 18 as in previous cycles. All criteria will continue to be met and no new single-failure mechanisms will be created. This change does not involve any alterations to plant equipment or procedures which would affect any operational modes or accident assumptions. This proposed license amendment does delete a technical specification that is no longer considered necessary. This deletion is prompted by the replacement of stainless steel clad fuel with zircaloy clad fuel. The zircaloy clad fuel, if it experiences damage, will release iodine into the primary system. Any iodine released is covered within the guidelines specified in the existing Technical Specification 3/4.4.8, ``Specific Activity.'' This specification will ensure that operation does not continue with radiochemistry values that exceed those assumed in our accident assumptions. The existing Technical Specification of specific activity along with the zircaloy clad fuel will ensure that a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated is not present. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. The possibility of an accident or malfunction of a different type than any evaluated previously in the UFSAR [Updated Final Safety Analysis Report] is not created. Since there are no changes in the way the plant is operated, the potential for an unanalyzed accident is not created. No new failure modes are introduced. The presence of defective fuel rods and the resultant iodine release would only affect potential offsite doses. This proposed license amendment does not increase the radiochemistry limits, but does revert the technical specifications back to the standard methodology and limitations that were unable to be used because of the stainless steel clad fuel. These new limitations will continue to ensure that doses remain within the limits prescribed. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed changes do not have any adverse impact on the protective boundaries. The margin of safety, as defined in the basis for any technical specification, is not reduced. The proposed changes do not adversely impact any of the safety systems, nor do they increase the number of challenges to the safety systems. The limit of 160 defective rods was chosen to be consistent with initial conditions assumed for the radiological design basis. The elimination of this specification is acceptable since the basis for the initial condition can be supported by the use of zircaloy clad fuel as opposed to the unique stainless steel clad. If future fuel defects are debris induced, the dose equivalent iodine will be within expected radiochemistry values and the resulting doses will be bounded. Therefore, there is no reduction in the margin of safety as defined in the basis of any technical specification with the deletion of the defective fuel rod technical specification. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Russell Library, 123 Broad Street, Middletown, Connecticut 06457. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, Counselors at Law, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Consolidated Edison Company of New York, Docket No. 50-247, Indian Point Nuclear Generating Unit No. 2, Westchester County, New York Date of amendment request: December 6, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment request would revise the Technical Specifications (TSs) to provide a temporary one-time revision to the Definition Section of the TS. Specifically, a footnote is added in the Definition Section of the TS which is applicable to TS 1.2.1, ``Cold Shutdown Condition,'' changing T avq less than or equal to 200 ○F to less than or equal to 250 ○F and TS 1.2.2, ``Hot Shutdown Condition,'' changing T avq greater than 200 ○F to greater than 250 ○F. The footnote further states that the change is for the one time, fuel out, chemical decontamination program. This program is currently scheduled for the upcoming 1995 refueling outage of the Indian Point Nuclear Generating Unit 2. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: The proposed change does not involve a significant hazards consideration since: 1. There is no significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident. Approval of the proposed one time change to the Technical Specification definition of cold shutdown for purposes of performing the full RCS [reactor coolant system] chemical decontamination without fuel in the reactor would provide relief from unnecessary technical specification action statements that are based on fuel in the reactor. Credible accidents with significant consequences are practically eliminated with the removal of the reactor fuel during the performance of the FSD [full reactor coolant system chemical decontamination]. In addition, specific actions would be taken in accordance with the requirements of the NRC approved WCAP-12932-A Rev. 2 to ensure that RCS and affected interfacing systems integrity are preserved. Thus, system capability within established accident scenarios would not be compromised. The proposed amendment would therefore not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. The possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed has not been created. As noted above, the proposed amendment seeks to eliminate unnecessary Technical Specification action requirements during the performance of full RCS chemical decontamination. These actions are unnecessary because there will be no fuel in the reactor and the RCS and other affected systems will be operated under conditions well within their design capability during the implementation of this process. In addition, the FSD effort will be conducted in accordance with the requirement(s) of the NRC approved Westinghouse topical report WCAP-12932-A Rev. 2. Accidents involving failures of the decontamination process system will not exceed the bounding conditions for any previously established accidents involving failure of a radwaste system. Accordingly, the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed will not be created. 3. There has been no reduction in the margin of safety. The proposed amendment provides relief from technical specification actions in the performance of the FSD which become unnecessary when there is no fuel in the reactor. The change will not adversely impact any Technical Specification required systems, structures or components. The design capability of systems, structures or components impacted will not be reduced. Consequently, no significant reduction in the margin of safety for any system, structure, or component is involved. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: White Plains Public Library, 100 Martine Avenue, White Plains, New York 10610. Attorney for licensee: Brent L. Brandenburg, Esq., 4 Irving Place, New York, New York 10003. NRC Project Director: Robert A. Capra Duke Power Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-413 and 50-414, Catawba Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, York County, South Carolina Date of amendment request: January 18, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendments remove the tables of containment penetration conductor overcurrent protective devices from the Technical Specifications (TS) in accordance with the guidance contained in Generic Letter 91-08, ``Removal of Component Lists from Technical Specifications.'' The tables would be relocated to Chapter 16 of the Catawba Final Safety Analysis Report (Selected Licensee Commitments Manual). In addition, the licensee proposes the removal of an obsolete footnote to TS 4.8.4. The footnote, which made TS 4.8.4.a initially effective following the first refueling outage of Unit 1, is no longer needed. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: Criterion 1 The requested amendments will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Relocating the component lists of containment penetration conductor overcurrent protective devices from the technical specifications to the [Selected Licensee Commitments] SLC Manual (with all attendant required technical specification changes as described previously and also including removal of the above described obsolete footnote) has no impact upon either the probability or consequences of any accident. No plant equipment is affected by the proposed change. No equipment is being added or deleted from the lists; only the source document for the lists is being changed. Any future changes to the lists (i.e., changes to the plant) will be subject to the provisions of 10CFR50.59 and also subject to the change control provisions of Chapter 6 of Catawba's Technical Specifications. Criterion 2 The requested amendments will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. No accident causal mechanisms are affected by the proposed change, as no change to the plant is being proposed. In addition, no change to the manner in which the plant is operated is being made. Finally, no changes to plant procedures are being made which would affect any accident causal mechanisms. Criterion 3 The requested amendments will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed change has no impact upon any safety margin. The proposed change is consistent with the guidance provided in Generic Letter 91-08 and the control provisions utilized as a result of relocating the subject component lists are at least as stringent as those set forth in the generic letter. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: York County Library, 138 East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 Attorney for licensee: Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422 South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 NRC Project Director: Loren R. Plisco, Acting Duke Power Company, Docket No. 50-413, Catawba Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, York County, South Carolina Date of amendment request: January 10, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise Technical Specifications 2.0 and 3/4.2 which currently requires the determination of the reactor coolant system flow rate by precision heat balance measurement at least once per 18 months. Date of publication of individual notice in Federal Register: January 26, 1994 (59 FR 3743) Expiration date of individual notice: February 25, 1994 Local Public Document Room location: York County Library, 138 East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina Date of amendment request: January 10, 1994 Description of amendment request: The amendments would change the method of measuring the reactor coolant system flow rate (Technical Specifications 2.0 and 3/4.2) during the 18-month surveillance for McGuire, Units 1 and 2. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: (1) This amendment will not significantly increase the probability or consequence of any accident previously evaluated. No component modification, system realignment, or change in operating procedure will occur which could affect the probability of any accident or transient. The change in method of flow measurement will not change the probability of actuation of any Engineered Safeguard Feature or other device. The actual flow rate will not change. The consequences of previously-analyzed accidents will not change as a result of the new method of flow measurement. (2) This amendment will not create the possibility of any new or different accidents not previously evaluated. No component modification or system realignment will occur which could create the possibility of a new event not previously considered. The elbow taps are already in place, and are used to monitor flow for the Reactor Protection System. They will not initiate any new events. (3) This amendment will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. As described in [the licensee's application], the change in method of RCS flow measurement will provide a more accurate indication of the flow. The actual flow rate will not be affected. The revised setpoints for low reactor coolant flow are driven by changes to statistical allowances and do not represent substantive, or less conservative, changes. There is no significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Astkins Library, University of North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223 Attorney for licensee: Mr. Albert Carr, Duke Power Company, 422 South Church Street, Charlotte, North Carolina 28242 NRC Project Director: Loren R. Plisco, Acting Entergy Operations Inc., Docket No. 50-382, Waterford Steam Electric Station, Unit 3, St. Charles Parish, Louisiana Date of amendment request: December 23, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise the Technical Specification (TS) for the following four items in accordance with the guidance in Generic Letter (GL) 93-05 ``Line Item Technical Specifications Improvements To Reduce Surveillance Requirements For Testing During Power Operation''. 1) GL Item 5.14 Radiation Monitors will change the channel functional test from monthly to quarterly. 2) GL Item 6.1 Reactor Coolant System (RCS) Isolation Valves will increase the time from 72 hours to 7 days for remaining in cold shutdown without leak testing the RCS isolation valves. 3) GL Item 6.6 Pressurizer Heaters will change the verification of capacity from at least once per 92 days to each refueling outage and will change the demonstration of the emergency power supply from at least once per 18 months to at each refueling outage. 4) GL Item 9.1 Auxiliary Feedwater Pump and System Testing will change the frequency of these pumps from once per 31 days on a staggered basis to quarterly on a staggered bases. All of the above are compatible with Waterford 3 plant operating experience and are consistent with NUREG-1366, ``Improvement To Technical Specification Surveillance Requirements,'' December 1992 and the licensing basis for Waterford 3. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: The proposed change to increase the radiation monitoring instrumentation channel functional test from monthly to quarterly will have no effect on design basis accidents. The findings in NUREG-1366 determined that this change will increase the availability of radiation monitors. The proposed change to increase the 72 hour time for remaining in cold shutdown without leak testing the RCS isolation valves to 7 days will not affect any design basis accidents. NUREG-1366 findings have determined that extending this interval does not significantly alter the associated risk. In addition, the current requirement has a potential for causing problems resulting from a hurried recovery. The proposed change to the pressurizer heater capacity test interval from quarterly to each refueling interval will have no affect on any design basis accidents. The TS requires at least 2 groups of pressurizer heaters each having a nominal capacity of 150 kW. Waterford 3 has 8 groups of pressurizer heaters; two proportional groups of 150 kW each, and 6 backup groups of 200 kW each. An evaluation of past operating experience has shown the availability of at least 6 groups of pressurizer heaters with a minimum of 150 kW each. The proposed change to extend the testing interval for the EFW [emergency feedwater] pumps will have no affect on any design basis accidents. The pumps will continue to be tested quarterly to the same standards applied to safety related pumps as defined by the ASME [American Society of Mechanical Engineers] Section XI Code. Satisfactory completion of testing in accordance with the Code is accepted as verification that safety related pumps will be available to perform their intended function. The proposed changes identified above are supported by the findings identified in NUREG-1366 and consistent with the guidance provided in Generic Letter 93-05. These line-item improvements are intended to improve plant safety, decrease equipment degradation, and remove unnecessary burden on personnel resources by reducing the amount of testing that the TS require during power operation. Therefore, the proposed changes identified above will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of any accident previously evaluated. The changes identified above only affect the frequency of surveillance testing. There are no changes that will alter operation of the plant or the manner in which it is operated. Therefore, the proposed changes will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. The proposed changes identified herein extend testing frequency in an effort to improve plant reliability and safety. The proposed changes are consistent with the findings in NUREG-1366, guidance in Generic Letter 93-05 and plant operating experience. As such, the proposed changes will preserve the established margin of safety for the affected specifications. Therefore, the proposed changes will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: University of New Orleans Library, Louisiana Collection, Lakefront, New Orleans, Louisiana 70122 Attorney for licensee: N. S. Reynolds, Esq., Winston & Strawn 1400 L Street NW., Washington, D.C. 20005-3502 NRC Project Director: William D. Beckner Georgia Power Company, Oglethorpe Power Corporation, Municipal Electric Authority of Georgia, City of Dalton, Georgia, Docket Nos. 50-424 and 50-425, Vogtle Electric Generating Plant, Units 1 and 2, Burke County, Georgia Date of amendment request: November 19, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed change would relocate the requirements of Technical Specification 3/4.3.4, Turbine Overspeed Protection, to Section 16.3 of the Vogtle Electric Generating Plant, Units 1 and 2, Final Safety Analysis Report. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed change involves the relocation of the TS [Technical Specification] requirements for the turbine overspeed protection system to the VEGP [Vogtle Electric Generating Plant] FSAR [Final Safety Analysis Report]. The requirements that will reside in the FSAR will continue to ensure that the probability of turbine missile generation is maintained below NRC limits as defined in NUREG-1048, Appendix U. Since the turbine overspeed protection system will remain capable of protecting the turbine from excessive overspeed, the proposed change will have no effect on the consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. The proposed change will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident than any previously evaluated. The proposed change does not involve any change to the configuration or method of operation of any plant equipment, and no new failure modes have been defined for any plant system or component. In addition, no new limiting failures have been identified as a result of the proposed change. The requirements for the turbine overspeed protection system that will reside in the FSAR will ensure that the system remains capable of protecting the turbine from excessive overspeed. Therefore, the proposed change will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident than any previously evaluated. 3. The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed change would allow the requirements for the turbine overspeed protection system to be relocated to the FSAR on the basis that the turbine overspeed protection system does not meet the criteria of the NRC Final Policy Statement on Technical Specifications Improvements for Nuclear Reactors. The requirements that will reside in the FSAR for the turbine overspeed protection system will ensure that the system remains capable of protecting the turbine from excessive overspeed. Therefore, the proposed change will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Burke County Public Library, 412 Fourth Street, Waynesboro, Georgia 30830. Attorney for licensee: Mr. Arthur H. Domby, Troutman Sanders, NationsBank Plaza, Suite 5200, 600 Peachtree Street, NE., Atlanta, Georgia 30308 NRC Project Director: Loren R. Plisco, Acting Houston Lighting & Power Company, City Public Service Board of San Antonio, Central Power and Light Company, City of Austin, Texas, Docket No. 50-499 South Texas Project, Unit 2, Matagorda County, Texas Date of amendment request: January 25, 1994 Description of amendment request: The licensee proposes to make a one-time change to the technical specifications to add new Technical Specifications 3/4.10.6 and 3/4.10.7 to the Special Test Exemptions section. The new TS would allow the restart of Unit 2 with expired calibrations on the core exit thermocouples (CET) and the reactor coolant system (RCS) resistance temperature detectors (RTD). This amendment will also add a new Technical Specification to allow the ascension to 75 percent rated thermal power with an expired precision heat balance reactor coolant flow measurement. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: (1)The proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of a previously evaluated accident. The proposed change will allow the restart of [STP] Unit 2 with Core Exit Thermocouples and Reactor Coolant System Resistance Temperature Detectors technically inoperable due to expired calibrations. The calibrations of these instruments can only be completed when the Unit reaches Normal Operating Pressure and Normal Operating Temperature in Mode 3. Once the calibrations of these instruments are completed, this one time change will expire and all of the existing applicable Limiting Conditions for Operations will become effective immediately. Since industry and South Texas Project Electric Generating Station experience has shown that the failure mechanism for these types of instrument is complete failure as opposed to a gradual drift, and there will be calibration points to compare RTD readings to actual RCS temperature as the RCS temperature increases, it is reasonable to expect these CETs/RTDs will function as they did before their calibrations expired. For this reason, all applicable functions, including COMS, T hot , T cold , and T avg are expected to operate normally. Because normal operation of the instruments is expected and the only reason for the instruments being declared inoperable is their expired calibrations, this change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed change will also allow the restart of Unit 2 with the precision heat balance RCS flow measurement surveillance expired. This surveillance is used to confirm the values indicated by the RCS flow meters. These instruments are calibrated every 18 months and the RCS flow meters will be checked every 12 hours to ensure adequate flow prior to the completion of the precision heat balance RCS flow measurement. Since this surveillance is only used to confirm the reading of calibrated instruments and does not involve any changes to the design or function of the instruments, this change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequence of an accident previously evaluated. (2) The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The operations of Unit 2 with the CETs and RCS RTDs technically inoperable due to expired calibrations, until these calibrations can be completed in Mode 3, does not affect the design bases of the CETs and RCS RTDs or any of the accident evaluations involving these instruments. Since industry and South Texas Project Electric Generating Station experience indicates that the failure mechanism for these types of instruments is not a gradual drift but complete failure, the reasonable expectation is the CETs/RTDs will function as they did prior to their calibrations expiring. Additionally, the operation of Unit 2 with the precision heat balance RCS flow measurement surveillance expired does not affect the design bases of the RCS flow meters or any of the accident evaluations involving these instruments. This surveillance is used to confirm the values indicated by the RCS flow meters. These instruments are calibrated every 18 months and the RCS flow meters will be checked every 12 hours to ensure adequate flow prior to the completion of the precision heat balance RCS flow measurement. Because normal operation of all of these instruments is expected, these changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. (3) The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The RCS RTDs are auctioneered to prevent a failed high or low instrument from adversely influencing the safety of the plant. This feature is still operable and will, along with normal operator activities, provide assurance that the margin of safety is not reduced by this change. In addition, the change does not affect the design bases, accident analysis, reliability or capability of the CETs/RTDs to perform their intended safety functions. The RCS flow meters will be checked every 12 hours to ensure adequate flow prior to the completion of the precision heat balance RCS flow measurement. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the request for amendment involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Location: Wharton County Junior College, J.M. Hodges Learning Center, 911 Boling Highway, Wharton, Texas 77488 Attorney for licensee: Jack R. Newman, Esq., Newman & Holtzinger, P.C., 1615 L Street, NW, Washington, DC 20036 NRC Project Director: Suzanne C. Black Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper Nuclear Station, Nemaha County, Nebraska Date of amendment request: September 28, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise the Cooper Nuclear Station (CNS) Technical Specifications to modify the licensee's organizational structure by removing the positions of ``Site Manager'' and ``Senior Manager of Operations.'' The functions presently given in CNS Technical Specifications for the Site Manager position will be assumed by the Vice President - Nuclear. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. Does the proposed license amendment involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated? Evaluation The proposed change removing the positions of Site Manager and Senior Manager of Operations from the Technical Specifications is administrative in nature. The functions and responsibilities of the previous position of Site Manager presently given in the plant Technical Specifications will be performed by the Vice President - Nuclear. Additionally, with the reorganization, the Senior Manager of Operations position is eliminated and therefore, this position is also being removed. The provision in the Technical Specifications for automatic shifting of Plant Manager responsibilities to the Senior Manager of Operations has also been removed. The shifting of Plant Manager responsibilities (in writing) to one of the Managers at CNS who is qualified for this position remains in the Technical Specifications. The position removals and responsibility transfers in the organization do not affect plant design or operation, nor do they affect the way any systems, structures, or components are operated or maintained. The individual filling the position ``Vice President - Nuclear'' is qualified to perform the assigned tasks and responsibilities. Restructuring of the sentence in specification 6.2.B.6, is purely an administrative change. Also, this proposed change does not alter the conditions or assumptions in any of the Updated Safety Analysis Report (USAR) accident analyses. Since the USAR accident analyses remain bounding, the consequences previously evaluated are not adversely affected by the proposed change. Therefore, it can be concluded that the proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. Does the proposed License Amendment create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? Evaluation The proposed Technical Specification revision removes all references to the position title of the Site Manager. The responsibilities of this position presently given in the Technical Specifications are being incorporated and performed by the position ``Vice President - Nuclear.'' Additionally, with the reorganization, the Senior Manager of Operations position is eliminated and therefore, this position is also being removed. The shifting of Plant Manager responsibilities (in writing) to one of the Managers at CNS who is qualified for this position remains in the Technical Specifications. All given management activities will continue to be performed by qualified individuals. Restructuring of the sentence in specification 6.2.B.6 is purely an administrative change. This change does not affect the design or operation of any system, structure, or component in the plant, and is considered to be an administrative change. Accordingly, no new failure modes have been defined for any plant system or component important to safety, nor has any new limiting failure been identified as a result of the proposed change. Therefore, this proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. 3. Does the proposed amendment involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety? Evaluation This proposed amendment involves a change to the Administrative Controls Section of the CNS Technical Specifications; specifically, removal of two positions referenced in the organizational structure. The Site Manager position is being deleted and the responsibilities of this position listed in the Technical Specifications are being performed by the Vice President - Nuclear. Additionally, with the reorganization, the Senior Manager of Operations position is eliminated and therefore, this position and responsibilities are also being removed. The shifting of Plant Manager responsibilities (in writing) to one of the Managers at CNS who is qualified for this position remains in the Technical Specifications. All given management activities, as described in the Technical Specifications, will continue to be performed by qualified individuals. Restructuring of the sentence in specification 6.2.B.6, is purely an administrative change. The proposed change does not adversely impact the plant's ability to meet applicable regulatory requirements. The proposed change does not alter any means of plant operation, nor does the proposed change involve any physical alterations to the plant and does not affect any plant safety parameters or setpoints. Therefore, this proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Asuburn Public Library, 118 15th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305 Attorney for licensee: Mr. G. D. Watson, Nebraska Public Power District, Post Office Box 499, Columbus, Nebraska 68602-0499 NRC Project Director: William D. Beckner Nebraska Public Power District, Docket No. 50-298, Cooper Nuclear Station, Nemaha County, Nebraska Date of amendment request: December 10, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise the Cooper Nuclear Station (CNS) Technical Specifications Sections 3/4.21 ``Environmental/Radiological Effluents,'' and 6.5, ``Station Reporting Requirements,'' to change the frequency of the reporting period of the ``Semiannual Radioactive Materials Release Report'' from semiannual to annual and to extend the reporting frequency of the Annual Design Change Report from an annual submittal to annually or along with the Updated Safety Analysis Report (USAR) updates required by 10 CFR 50.71(e). These proposed changes are intended to make the CNS Technical Specifications consistent with the current provisions of 10 CFR 50.36(a) and 10 CFR 50.59(b), respectively. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. Does the proposed license amendment involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated? Evaluation The proposed changes are administrative in nature and makes the Cooper Nuclear Station (CNS) Technical Specifications (T/S) consistent with amended regulations of 10CFR50.36(a), and 10CFR 50.59(b) by reducing the submittal frequency of certain reports to the NRC. The proposed revisions do not involve any change to plant design, plant operation, or configuration of any plant equipment that is used to mitigate the consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Also, the proposed changes do not alter the conditions or assumptions in any of the Updated Safety Analysis Report (USAR) accident analyses. Since the USAR accident analyses remain bounding, the radiological consequences previously evaluated are not adversely affected by the proposed changes. As administrative changes, all defined terms on the affected pages have been capitalized. Therefore, it can be concluded that the proposed changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. Does the proposed License Amendment create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? Evaluation The proposed changes are administrative in nature and makes the CNS T/S consistent with amended regulations of 10CFR50.36(a), and 10CFR50.59(b) by reducing the submittal frequency of certain reports to the NRC. The proposed revisions do not involve any change to plant design, plant operation, or configuration of any plant equipment that is used to mitigate the consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Accordingly, no new failure modes have been created for any plant system or component important to safety nor has any new limiting failure been identified as a result of the proposed changes. Also, there will be no change in the types or increase in the amount of effluents released offsite. As administrative changes, all defined terms on the affected pages have been capitalized. Therefore, the proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. 3. Does the proposed change create a significant reduction in the margin of safety? Evaluation The proposed changes are administrative in nature and do not adversely impact the plant's ability to meet applicable regulatory requirements related to liquid or gaseous effluents, and solid waste releases. The proposed changes do not alter any administrative controls over radioactive effluents, nor do the proposed changes involve any physical alterations to the plant with respect to radioactive effluents. These changes do not affect the meaning, application, and function of the T/S requirements. The proposed change will reduce the administrative burden of NRC reporting without reducing the protection for public health and safety. As administrative changes, all defined terms on the affected pages have been capitalized. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Asuburn Public Library, 118 15th Street, Auburn, Nebraska 68305 Attorney for licensee: Mr. G. D. Watson, Nebraska Public Power District, Post Office Box 499, Columbus, Nebraska 68602-0499 NRC Project Director: William D. Beckner Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation, Docket No. 50-220, Nine Mile Point Nuclear Station Unit No. 1, Oswego County, New York Date of amendment request: January 6, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise Technical Specification (TS) Tables 3.2.7, 3.6.2a, 4.6.2a, 3.6.2b and 4.6.2b to delete the main steam line isolation and automatic reactor shutdown (reactor scram) functions of the Main Steam Line Radiation Monitor. Conforming changes would also be made to the Bases of these TSs and to the Bases for TS 2.1.2. The licensee stated that the proposed changes would be consistent with the NRC's Improved Standard Technical Specifications, NUREG-1433, and with NRC-approved (Safety Evaluation, dated May 15, 1991) Boiling Water Reactor Owners' Group Licensing Topical Report NEDO-31400A, dated July 9, 1987. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 1 in accordance with the proposed amendment will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated because the functions being removed do not contribute to avoidance of any previously evaluated accidents. Further, the changes have been shown to have an insignificant impact on overall reactivity control failure frequency. This insignificant impact is offset by the relatively large reduction in core damage frequency realized by the implementation of these changes. Hence, the probability or consequences of previously evaluated accidents are not significantly increased due to this change. To the contrary, as stated in the topical report [NEDO-31400A] the changes provide a net improvement in overall plant safety. The proposed amendment does not involve a physical or procedural change to any structure, component or system that significantly affects the probability or consequences of any accident or malfunction of equipment important to safety previously evaluated in the Final Safety Analysis Report (Updated). The proposed amendment will involve a change to reactor protection and isolation actuation systems circuitry that will remove the automatic reactor shutdown and Main Steam Line Isolation Valve closure functions of the Main Steam Line Radiation Monitor. However, the physical changes will not affect the remaining scram or vessel isolation functions. [***T]he methods, procedures and assumptions used to perform the eneric analyses in NED0-31400A are bounding for the Nine Mile Point Unit 1 with regard to input values. Niagara Mohawk has also provided in the evaluation reasonable assurance that significantly increased levels of radioactivity in the main steam lines will be controlled expeditiously to limit both occupational and environmental exposures. The Main Steam Line Radiation Monitor alarm setpoints will be set at 1.5 times the normal full power background dose rate and should any monitor exceed its alarm setpoint, the reactor coolant will be sampled to determine activity levels and the possible need for additional corrective actions. The offgas radiation monitor is a more sensitive monitor than the Main Steam Line Radiation Monitor because the nitrogen-16 source, dominating the radiation signal to the Main Steam Line Radiation Monitor, has decayed by the time the radiation monitor can be affected by any increased levels of activity. Therefore, setting the offgas radiation monitor at 1.5 times the nitrogen-16 background dose rate is not reasonable since setting the monitor that low can lead to spurious activations of the alarm. Nine Mile Point Unit 1's monitor configuration, as described in the FSAR, detects the concentration of the offgas as it flows through the pipe. Thus, the detector is sensitive to fluctuations in condenser air inleakage, which can have an appreciable impact on the monitor readings, especially at readings as low as 1.5 times the normal full power background. Therefore, Niagara Mohawk proposes to set the alarm at five (5) times the normal full power background, which is still very conservative compared to the value allowed by Technical Specification 3.6.15.c., which is set based on Nine Mile Point Unit 1's Offsite Dose Calculation Manual. Niagara Mohawk believes that a setting of five (5) times the normal full power background is extremely conservative and is low enough to ensure detection of even minor fuel performance changes. Furthermore, if the monitor alarms at this setpoint of five times the normal full power background, the offgas will immediately be sampled and analyzed, followed by an analysis of a reactor coolant sample. Furthermore, the analyses in the Licensing Topical Report demonstrate that removal of the automatic reactor scram and Main Steam Line Isolation Valve closure functions of the Main Steam Line Radiation Monitor does not change the conclusions in the Final Safety Analysis Report (Updated) that the calculated radiological release consequences of the bounding control rod drop accident will not exceed the acceptable dose limits specified in 10CFR[Part]100. Therefore, Niagara Mohawk concludes that the proposed amendment will not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 1 in accordance with the proposed amendment will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The function of a Main Steam Line Radiation Monitor trip is to detect abnormal fission produce release and isolate the main steam lines, thereby stopping the transport of fission products from the reactor to the main condenser. The monitors do not perform a prevention function for any kind of accident. The main steam line high radiation scram and main steam line isolation functions were originally intended to mitigate, not prevent, an existing accident scenario. However, the functions being removed do not contribute to avoidance or mitigation of any previously evaluated accidents since no credit is taken for these functions in any design basis event for terminating the initiating event or assuring the radioactive release remains within accepted limits. The existence of a Main Steam Line Radiation Monitor trip does not prevent the occurrence of a fuel failure event or any other type of event. Elimination of these functions will not introduce a new or different accident scenario. The proposed amendment represents a change to the physical configuration of the plant in that some reactor protection system circuits will be modified to eliminate the main steam line high radiation scram and main steam line isolation signals. However, these changes will not affect the remaining scram or vessel isolation functions. In all other respects, plant design and operation remain unchanged. Therefore, Niagara Mohawk Power Corporation concludes that the proposed amendment will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The operation of Nine Mile Point Unit 1 in accordance with the proposed amendment will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed changes do not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety because, as shown in the topical report, the changes represent an overall improvement in plant safety in that the core damage frequency is reduced. Safe operation of the plant is enhanced by elimination of the unnecessary scram and isolation of the reactor vessel. With implementation of these changes, the primary heat sink remains available, a large transient on the vessel and safety-related actuations is avoided, and the Offgas System remains available to control the pathway of a potential release. Therefore, Niagara Mohawk concludes that the proposed amendment will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Reference and Documents Department, Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126. Attorney for licensee: Mark J. Wetterhahn, Esquire, Winston & Strawn, 1400 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20005-3502. NRC Project Director: Robert A. Capra Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, Docket No. 50-245, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit 1, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: January 14, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment corrects an editorial error. Specifically, the amendment changes the reference in Limiting Condition for Operation (LCO) 3.4.D from ``3.3.A through C'' to ``3.4.A, 3.4.B, and 3.4.C.'' The amendment also changes the associated bases to clarify the LCO minimum solution concentration requirement of 11 weight percent and updates the excerpt from 10 CFR 50.62 to reflect the current text of the regulation. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: In accordance with 10 CFR 50.92, NNECO [Northeast Nuclear Energy Company] has reviewed the proposed change and has concluded that it does not involve a significant hazards consideration (SHC). The basis for this conclusion is that the three criteria of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are not compromised. The proposed change does not involve an SHC because the change would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed change only modifies an incorrect reference in Section 3.4.D of the Technical Specifications. In practice, if Specification 3.4.A, 3.4.B, or 3.4.C cannot be met, an orderly shutdown is initiated. As currently written, the failure to meet the requirements of Section 3.3 would also initiate a shutdown in accordance with Section 3.4.D. This is not the intent of Section 3.4.D since Section 3.3 already has specific shutdown requirements. This proposed change will correct Section 3.4.D so that it limits the conditions under which a plant shutdown must be initiated to the LCOs of the standby liquid control system. Therefore, this proposed change will not increase the probability or consequences of an accident. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The proposed change corrects an incorrect section reference. There is no change to the operation or design of the plant, nor is there any change to the operability requirements of either section. The proposed change properly identifies the conditions under which the plant must be shutdown if an LCO is not met for the standby liquid control system. In practice, if Specification 3.4.A, 3.4.B, or 3.4.C cannot be met, an orderly shutdown is initiated. Since there is no change in plant operation or design, there is no possibility of a different kind of accident. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed change does not modify the design or function of the plant, nor does it reduce operability requirements of either Section 3.3 or 3.4. The proposed change only corrects an incorrect section reference by identifying the correct shutdown requirements for the standby liquid control system. Since there is no change to plant operation or design and the shutdown requirements are not reduced, there is no reduction in the margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resources Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, Counselors at Law, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Northeast Nuclear Energy Company (NNECO), Docket Nos. 50-245, 50-336 and 50-423, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Units 1, 2 and 3, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: December 22, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendments would change the Technical Specification (TS) as follows: 1. Change the title of the Nuclear Station Director to Senior Vice President - Millstone Station. 2. Remove the requirement to provide a copy of Plant Operations Review Committee (PORC) and Site Operations Review Committee (SORC) meeting minutes to the Executive Vice President - Nuclear. The Senior Vice President - Millstone Station is being proposed to replace the Executive Vice President - Nuclear for receipt of PORC and SORC meeting minutes. 3. Make editorial changes to the Millstone Unit No. 1 TS Index. 4. Correct a typographical error in Section 6.2.1.d of the Millstone Unit No. 1 TS. 5. Correct a typographical error in Section 6.5.3.1.a of the Millstone Unit No. 3 TS. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration (SHC), which is provided below: The proposed changes do not involve an SHC because the changes do not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. No design basis accidents are affected by these proposed changes. The proposed changes are administrative and editorial in nature to reflect a recent reorganization, removal of the Executive Vice President - Nuclear from receipt of PORC and SORC meeting minutes, addition of the Senior Vice President - Millstone Station to the receipt of PORC and SORC meeting minutes, and editorial changes to the Millstone Unit Nos. 1 and 3 Technical Specifications. No safety systems are adversely affected by the proposed changes, and no failure modes are associated with the changes. Therefore, there is no impact on the probability of occurrence or the consequences of any design basis events. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. Since there are no changes in the way the plant is operated, the potential for an unanalyzed accident is not created. There is no impact on plant response, and no new failure modes are introduced. These proposed administrative and editorial changes have no impact on safety limits or design basis accidents, and they have no potential to create a new or unanalyzed event. 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The changes do not directly affect any protective boundaries nor do they impact the safety limits for the protective boundaries. These proposed changes are administrative and editorial in nature. Therefore, there can be no reduction in the margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, Counselors at Law, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-423, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 3, New London County, Connecticut Date of amendment request: December 17, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise the Technical Specifications to allow a relaxation in setpoint tolerance of the pressurizer safety valves (PSVs) and main steam safety valves (MSSVs) from plus or minus 1% to plus or minus 3% for the ``as-found'' test condition. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration (SHC), which is presented below: The proposed changes do not involve an SHC because the changes would not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed changes revise the ``as found'' setpoint tolerances for the PSVs and MSSVs from [plus or minus] 1% to [plus or minus] 3%. For the resetting of the PSVs and MSSVs, a [plus or minus] 1% setpoint tolerance will be required prior to declaring the valve operable for those instances where the [plus or minus] 1% tolerance was exceeded. The proposed changes involve no hardware modifications to plant structures, systems, or components. The proposed setpoint tolerance of [plus or minus] 3% for the ``as-found'' condition was previously evaluated as part of the PSE [Plant Safety Evaluation] report for the transition to VANTAGE 5H fuel. The PSE was reviewed and approved by the NRC staff as a part of a prior license amendment. (9) In addition, since the proposed changes have previously been evaluated by the PSE report, the calculated radiological release associated with the PSE remain unaffected. In addition, the proposed changes are in compliance with applicable sections of the ASME Code and will not significantly affect structural integrity of either the reactor coolant system or the main steam system. Therefore, the proposed changes will have no effect on the probability or consequences of previously evaluated accidents. 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. The proposed changes will not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from those previously analyzed. The changes revise the Technical Specifications so that setpoint tolerance for the PSVs and MSSVs can be [plus or minus] 3% for the ``as-found'' condition. These changes have no effect on plant operation. The PSV and MSSV setpoint drift in excess of the [plus or minus] 1% lift setting is an occurrence which has previously and may subsequently occur. The analyses for the transition to the VANTAGE 5H fuel have examined the effects on the plant accident analyses for relaxation in PSV and MSSV setpoint tolerance to [plus or minus] 3%. Also, these changes will have no effect on ASME Code compliance. These changes do not introduce any new failures. 3. Involve a significant reduction in the margin of safety. In support of the transition to the VANTAGE 5H fuel, a PSE was performed which assumed a [plus or minus] 3% setpoint tolerance for both the PSVs and MSSVs. Therefore, the effects of relaxing the PSV and MSSV setpoints are already accounted for in the existing analyses of record and will not affect the plants accident analyses. Additionally, the proposed changes will have no significant effect on the structural integrity of the reactor coolant system or the main steam system. Also, for those occurrences where the ``as-found'' setpoint of the PSV or MSSV is in excess of [plus or minus] 1%, a resetting to within [plus or minus] 1% of the valve setpoint will be required prior to declaring the valve operable. Therefore, the proposed changes will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Attorney for licensee: Gerald Garfield, Esquire, Day, Berry & Howard, City Place, Hartford, Connecticut 06103-3499. NRC Project Director: John F. Stolz Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-275 and 50-323, Diablo Canyon Nuclear Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, San Luis Obispo County, California Date of amendment requests: December 14, 1993 (Reference LAR 93-07) T3Description of amendment requests: The proposed amendment would revise the combined Technical Specifications (TS) for the Diablo Canyon Power Plant (DCPP) Unit Nos. 1 and 2 to revise Technical Specification (TS) 3/4.8.1, ``A.C. Sources'' to increase the required quantity of emergency diesel generator (EDG) fuel oil stored in the engine-mounted tank (day tank). The amendment request also proposes to revise TS 3/4.7.11, ``Area Temperature Monitoring,'' and 3/4.8.1 to remove references to a five EDG configuration. The specific TS changes proposed are as follows: (1) TS 3/4.7.11 would be revised to remove references to a common (swing) diesel generator in Table 3.7-5. (2) TS 3.8.1.1 and TS 3.8.1.2 would be revised to increase the required minimum contained volume in the EDG engine-mounted fuel tank (day tank) from 200 gallons to 250 gallons. (3) TS 3.8.1.1 and TS 4.8.1.1.2 would be revised to remove references to a five EDG configuration. (4) TS 3.8.1.2 would be revised to correct a footnote. TS Bases 3/4.8.1, 3/4.8.2, and 3/4.8.3 would be revised to clarify commitments to Regulatory Guide 1.137 and expand the scope of information contained within the TS Bases. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. Does the change involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated? The proposed increase in day tank TS minimum contained volume requirements provides additional conservatism to assure the EDG fuel oil contained in the day tank is sufficient to provide adequate time for an operator to take corrective action to restore the fuel oil supply to the affected day tank in the unlikely event that the fuel oil supply from the main tanks were cut off. Deletion of TS references to a five diesel generator configuration and correction of the TS 3.8.1.2 footnote are administrative changes that do not change the operating methodology of DCPP. These proposed administrative changes remove outdated information and correct an administrative oversight. Therefore, the proposed changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. Does the change create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? The proposed increase in day tank TS minimum contained volume requirements would not involve any physical change to the plant systems or, in particular, to the EDG day tanks. The change does not affect the ability of the EDGs to start and to fulfill their safety-related function. Hence, no new failure mechanisms will be introduced. The proposed removal of references to a five EDG configuration and correction of the TS 3.8.1.2 footnote are administrative in nature. Further, the proposed changes would not result in any physical alteration to any plant system. Therefore, the proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. 3. Does the change involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety? Increasing the day tank TS minimum contained volume requirements is a conservative change which provides additional margin to assure the EDG fuel oil contained in the day tank is sufficient to provide adequate time for an operator to take corrective action to restore the fuel oil supply to the affected day tank in the unlikely event that the fuel oil supply from the main tanks were cut off. The proposed change will not alter any accident analysis assumptions, initial conditions, or results. Consequently, the proposed change to increase the EDG day tank TS contained fuel oil requirement does not have any effect on the margin of safety. The proposed administrative changes clarify the TS by removing references to a five diesel generator configuration and correcting the TS 3.8.1.2 footnote. Therefore, the proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment requests involve no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: California Polytechnic State University, Robert E. Kennedy Library, Government Documents and Maps Department, San Luis Obispo, California 93407 Attorney for licensee: Christopher J. Warner, Esq., Pacific Gas and Electric Company, P.O. Box 7442, San Francisco, California 94120 NRC Project Director: Theodore R. Quay Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-352 and 50-353, Limerick Generating Station, Units 1 and 2, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania Date of amendment request: December 9, 1993 Description of amendment request: The amendment would change the Operating Licenses and their corresponding Appendices A to reflect the planned implementation of the Power Rerate Program at Limerick Generating Station Units 1 and 2, and the corresponding increase in the authorized maximum reactor core power level by five percent to 3458 megawatts thermal (MWt) from the current limit of 3293 MWt. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1) The proposed Operation License (OL) changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. The proposed power rerate imposes only minor increases in the plant operating conditions. Plant systems, components, and structures have been verified to be capable of performing their intended functions under rerated conditions. Where necessary, some components will be modified or replaced prior to implementation of the Power Rerate Program to accommodate the revised operating condition. No new component or system interactions that could lead to an accident are created. As discussed below, no transient events result in a new sequence of events which could lead to a new accident scenario. Emergency Core Cooling Systems (ECCS) - Loss-of-Coolant Accident (LOCA) Analysis. The current ECCS-LOCA performance analysis is already bounding for power rerate conditions. The fuel peak cladding temperature for rerate conditions is 1,345 ○F, which is below the 2,200 ○F regulatory limit. Therefore, the analysis demonstrates that the LGS, Units 1 and 2 will continue to comply with 10CFR50.46 and 10CFR50, Appendix K. Transient Event Analysis The evaluation results for transient events indicate the margin to the fuel Safety Limit Minimum Critical Power ratio (MCPR) will be maintained for the 8x8 array fuel types, such as GE8x8NB or GE11 fuel design. The current fuel thermal-mechanical limits will continue to be met. Also, the power-dependent and flow-dependent MCPR and Maximum Average Planar Linear Heat Generation Rate (MAPLHGR) limits developed as part of the Average Power Range Monitor Rod Block Monitor Technical Specifications (ARTS) improvement program are applicable to power rerate. A TS Change Request to implement the ARTS improvement program was submitted to the NRC by letter dated August 27, 1993. The peak reactor vessel bottom head pressure will remain within the American Society for Mechanical Engineers (ASME) Code requirement for reactor overpressure protection. The analysis performed focused on the most limiting transient events in each disturbance category selected specifically for the power rerate evaluations. The results demonstrated that LGS, Unit 1 and Unit 2 core thermal power output can be safely increased to power rerate parameters without impacting plant safety during a postulated transient event. The details of the impact to the description in the UFSAR are delineated below. a) Events Resulting in a Core Coolant Temperature Decrease i) Loss of Feedwater Heating (LFWH) The delta Critical Power Ratio (delta CPR) for the LFWH event at the rerated power is bounded by the result estimated for the current rated power level and remains significantly less than the Operating Limit MCPR. There is no change between the delta CPR results for high and low reactor core flow conditions. The calculated thermal and mechanical overpowers for this event at power rerate conditions also meet the fuel design criteria. ii) Feedwater Controller Failure (FWCF) Maximum Demand For the Increased Core Flow (ICF) and the Maximum Extended Load Line Limit (MELLL) conditions, the trend for the FWCF - Maximum Demand event at rerate conditions is consistent with the current rated power analysis. For both high and low reactor core flow conditions, the FWCF - Maximum Demand event becomes most limiting due to the Turbine Bypass Valve Out-of-Service (TBVOOS) and the Recirculation Pump Trip Out-of-Service (RPTOOS) analyses assumption. The fuel thermal margin results remain within the acceptable limits for the fuel type analyzed. b) Events Resulting in a Reactor Pressure Increase i) Turbine Trip with No Bypass (TTNBP) At rerate conditions, the fuel transient thermal and mechanical overpower results remain below the NRC acceptance criteria. ii) Generator Load Rejection with No Bypass (LRNBP) The fuel transient thermal responses are less severe than for the TTNBP event described above. Therefore, at power rerate conditions, the LRNBP event remains bounded by the TTNBP event. iii) Main Steam Isolation Valve Closure, Flux Scram (MSIVF) The peak reactor vessel bottom head pressure for rerate conditions is slightly higher than the pressure at current rated conditions due to the higher initial reactor coolant system pressure. However, this result is still below the ASME overpressure limit of 1,375 psig by a margin of 33 psi. c) Events Resulting in a Core Coolant System Flow Rate Decrease i) Recirculation Pump Seizure The recirculation pump seizure assumes instantaneous stoppage of the pump motor shaft of one recirculation pump. As a result, the reactor core flow decreases rapidly. The reactor flow decreases rapidly. The reactor vessel level swell due to the rapid reactor core flow reduction reaches the high reactor water level setpoint, causing a feedwater pump trip, a main turbine trip, and subsequently a reactor scram on turbine stop valves closure. The peak neutron flux and average fuel surface heat flux do not increase significantly above the initial conditions, therefore no impact on the fuel thermal margin is postulated to occur. d) Events Resulting in Reactivity and Power Distribution Anomalies i) Rod Withdrawal Error (RWE) The calculated delta CPR of 0.10 for this event at rerate conditions is bounded by the generic ARTS - based RWE limits of 0.13. Therefore, the generic ARTS-based RWE analysis delta CPR result is verified to be applicable for power rerate conditions for LGS Units 1 and 2. e) Events Resulting in a Reactor Coolant Inventory Increase i) Inadvertent High Pressure Coolant Injection (HPCI) System Actuation Based on the peak average fuel surface heat flux results, the HPCI actuation event will be bounded by the limiting pressurization event (i.e., the TTNBP event described above) for delta CPR consideration. Anticipated Transients Without SCRAM (ATWS) Analysis A generic evaluation for the ATWS event is provided in Section 3.7 of the Topical Report NEDC-31984P, ``Generic Evaluations of General Electric Boiling Water Reactor Power Uprate,'' Supplement 1, dated July 1991. This evaluation concludes that the ATWS acceptance criteria for fuel, reactor pressure vessel (RPV) and containment integrity will be met, if the following exists; - Reactor power increases less than or equal to 5% - Reactor Steam Dome pressure increases less than or equal to 40 psi; - Safety Relief Valve (SRV) opening setpoints increase less than or equal to 80 psi; and - ATWS high pressure setpoint increases less than or equal to 20 psi. The plant's parameter changes will remain within the above criteria, except that the ATWS high pressure setpoint increase is 40 psi rather than 20 psi in order to maintain the same relationship between the ATWS high pressure setpoint and the SRV opening setpoints. Based on the previous analysis, this difference would have a minor effect on the analysis results. The only significant change is a slightly higher (i.e., about 10 psi) peak RPV pressure. For additional assurance, a LGS specific ATWS analysis for a 5% power rerate was performed. The events analyzed were: 1. Main Steam Isolation Valve (MSIV) Closure, 2. Pressure Regulator Failure - Open, 3. Loss of Feedwater, and 4. Inadvertent Opening of a Relief Valve. The LGS specific analysis also concludes that the ATWS acceptance criteria for fuel, RPV, and containment integrity will be met for a 5% power rerate. Other Evaluations The impact of power rerate on the radiological consequences of the accidents presented in UFSAR Chapter 15 was determined based on the current design basis analyses, post rerate implementation system conditions, and radiological source terms. In general, power rerate will result in a small increase in the quantity of radioactive material released during accidents and therefore slightly higher (i.e., approximately 2% to 5%) accident doses. However, USFAR Chapter 15 accident doses for rerated conditions remain within the regulatory limits specified in 10CFR100 and 10CFR50, Appendix A, GDC 19. The UFSAR Chapter 15 accidents that were evaluated and updated for rerate conditions are as follows: 1) Loss of Coolant Accident (LOCA) 2) Main Steam Line Break (MSLB) 3) Fuel Handling Accident 4) Control Rod Drop Accident 5) Instrument Line Break 6) Feedwater Line Break 7) Steam Jet Air Ejector Line Break 8) Offgas System Failure 9) Liquid Radioactive Waste System Failure An evaluation was also performed to address the power rerate impact on accident mitigative features, structures, systems, and components, within the balance of plant. The results are as follows: - Auxiliary systems such as the Emergency Service Water, Residual Heat Removal (RHR) Service Water, Ultimate Heat Sink (i.e., the spray pond), safety-related portions of secondary containment reactor enclosure air cooling, primary containment drywell air recirculation, and Emergency Diesel Generator enclosure ventilation were confirmed to operate acceptably under normal and accident conditions after implementation of power rerate. - Combustible gas control systems were confirmed to be capable of maintaining oxygen concentrations inside the primary containment within regulatory limits under post accident rerate conditions. - The secondary containment reactor enclosure recirculation system and Standby Gas Treatment system were confirmed to be able to adequately contain, process, and control the release of normal and post-accident levels of radioactive material after implementation of power rerate. - Instrumentation was reviewed and confirmed to be capable of performing their control and monitoring functions under rerate conditions. - Electric power systems including the main turbine generator and switchgear components were verified as being capable of providing the electrical load as a result of the rerated power levels. No safety-related electrical loads were affected which would impact the Emergency Diesel Generators. - Piping systems were evaluated for the effect of operation at higher power levels, including transient loadings. The evaluation confirmed that with few exceptions piping and supports are adequate to accommodate the increased loadings resulting from operation at rerated power conditions. In a few cases, piping supports will be modified to accept the higher forces due to rerate conditions. - The effect of rerate conditions on high energy line break (HELB) events for all Nuclear Steam Supply System (NSSS) and Balance of Plant (BOP) systems was evaluated. The evaluation confirmed structures, systems, and components important to safety are capable of accommodating the effects of jet impingement and blowdown forces and the environmental effects resulting from HELB events at rerate conditions. - The Moderate Energy Line Break (MELB) analysis was evaluated for impact due to rerate conditions. Sufficient margin was determined to exist in the original analysis to bound the rerate conditions. - Main control room (MCR) habitability was evaluated. Post-accident MCR and Technical Support Center (TSC) doses were confirmed to be within the limits of General Design Criterion (GDC) 19 of 10CFR50 Appendix A. - Radiation doses for normal operation were reviewed and confirmed to remain within the limits of 10CFR20 and 10CFR50, Appendix I. The impact on post-accident sampling activities and post-accident access to vital areas was also confirmed to be acceptable. - The environmental qualification of electrical and mechanical equipment important to safety was evaluated for the impact of normal and accident operating conditions at rerated power levels. The majority of equipment will remain qualified for the new conditions. For equipment that is not qualified, corrective actions will be taken to ensure the plant equipment will perform their intended functions under rerate conditions. No new equipment will be added for power rerate which would increase the potential for component failure. The Preventative Maintenance Program (PMP) will continue to provide for appropriate equipment repair or replacement during operation at rerated power conditions. - The impact of operation at rerated power levels was evaluated for Station Blackout and Fire Safety Shutdown area heat-up concerns. The evaluation confirmed there is no adverse impact from rerate on the ability of the plant to achieve safe shutdown under these conditions. - The consequences of postulated transients and special events (i.e., ATWS and Station Blackout) will remain within NRC acceptance criteria for rerate conditions. Concurrent malfunctions assumed to occur during accidents have been accounted for in the safety analyses for rerate conditions. The consequences of these equipment malfunctions will not change with implementation of the Power Rerate Program. Equipment that is important to safety either is capable of or will be modified and/or replaced to be capable of performing its intended function. The availability of redundant systems to provide safety functions in the event of component malfunction is not impacted as a result of rerate conditions. Furthermore, the impact of power rerate on the consequences of abnormal transients and accident conditions which are a result of component malfunctions has been shown to be acceptable. The probability (i.e., frequency of occurrence) of Design Basis Accidents (DBAs) occurring is not affected by the proposed increased power level, as the applicable regulatory criteria established for plant equipment (e.g., ASME Code, the Institute of Electrical and Electronics Engineers (IEEE) standards, National Electrical Manufacturer's Association (NEMA) standards, NRC Regulatory Guides) will still be followed as the plant is operated at the rerated power level. Reactor SCRAM setpoints will be established such that there is no significant increase in frequency due to rerate conditions. No new challenges to safety-related equipment will result from the implementation of power rerate. The changes in consequences of hypothetical accidents which would occur from 102% of the rerated power, compared to those previously evaluated, are in all cases not significant, because the accident evaluations from a power rerate to 105% of original rated power will not result in exceeding the applicable NRC approved acceptance limits. The spectrum of hypothetical accidents and transients has been investigated, and has been determined to meet the current regulatory criteria for LGS, Units 1 and 2 at rerate conditions. The offsite radiological doses resulting from DBAs are calculated to increase by only a few percent (i.e., approximately 2% to 5%) because of the rerated power level, and will remain below 10CFR100 limits. In the area of reactor core design, the fuel operating limits will continue to be met at the rerated power level, and fuel reload analyses will continue to show that plant transients will meet the criteria accepted by the NRC as specified in NEDO-24011, ``GESTAR II.'' Challenges to fuel or ECCS performance were evaluated and shown to still meet the criteria of 10CFR50.46 and 10CFR50, Appendix K. Challenges to the primary containment have been evaluated and still meet 10CFR50, Appendix A, GDC 38, ``Long Term Cooling,'' and GDC 50, ``Containment.'' Radiological release events have been evaluated and have been shown to meet the guidelines of 10CFR100. Therefore, the proposed OL changes do not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2) The proposed OL changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. All actions to ensure that safety-related structures, systems, and components will remain within their design allowable values, and ensure that they can perform their intended functions under rerate conditions will be taken prior to implementation of power rerate. Power rerate does not increase challenges to or create any new challenges to safety-related equipment or other equipment whose failure could cause an accident. No new equipment is added as a result of implementing the Power Rerate Program which would create the possibility of a new type of accident. In addition, power rerate does not create any new sequence of events or failure modes that lead to a new type of accident. Implementation of power rerate will increase the average neutron flux in the reactor core, which increases the integrated neutron fluence on the reactor pressure vessel (RPV) wall. To account for the higher fluence, an RPV fracture toughness analysis was performed for power rerate conditions. This analysis resulted in a proposed revision to the ``pressure vs. temperature'' curves currently provided in the Technical Specifications (TS), that will maintain the current level of protection for the RPV. Therefore, power rerate will not result in any new failure mode for the RPV, and thus, does not create the possibility of a different type of accident from any accident previously evaluated. No new operating mode, safety-related equipment lineup, accident scenario, or equipment failure mode was identified as resulting from the implementation of the Power Rerate Program. The full spectrum of accident considerations defined in NRC Regulatory Guide 1.70, ``Standard Format and Content of Safety Analysis Reports for Nuclear Power Plants - LWR Edition,'' Revision 3, dated November 1978, have been evaluated for rerate conditions and no new or different kind of accident has been identified. Implementation of the Power Rerate Program uses already-developed technology and applies it within the capabilities of already existing plant equipment in accordance with presently existing regulatory criteria to include applicable NRC approved codes, standards, and methods. General Electric (GE) has designed Boiling Water Reactors (BWRs) of higher power levels than the rerated power of any of the currently operating BWR fleet and no new power dependent accidents have been identified. Therefore, the proposed OL changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. 3) The proposed OL changes do not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Power rerate will not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety, as plant equipment and reactions to transients and hypothetical accidents will not result in exceeding the presently approved NRC acceptance limits. The accident doses are calculated to increase a few percent (approximately 2% to 5%) because of power rerate, but remain below 10 CFR 100 limits. The events (i.e., transients, accidents, and ATWS) that form the bases of the TS were evaluated for power rerate conditions. Although some changes to the TS are required to implement power rerate, no NRC acceptance limit will be exceeded. Therefore, the margins of safety with respect to the safety limits and other TS bases will be maintained. For systems addressed in the TS Section 2.2, 3/4.1, 3/4.2, 3/4.3, 3/4.4, 3/4.5, 3/4.6 and 3/4.7 (i.e., Reactor Protection System, Standby Liquid Control System, Power Distribution Limits, Instrumentation, Reactor Coolant System, Emergency Core Cooling Systems, Containment Systems, and Plant Systems), all components will be operable and capable of performing their intended functions under power rerate conditions such that the margin of safety is not adversely impacted. Therefore, the proposed OL changes do not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Pottstown Public Library, 500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. Attorney for licensee: J. W. Durham, Sr., Esquire, Sr. V. P. and General Counsel, Philadelphia Electric Company, 2301 Market Street, Philadelphia, Pennsylvania 19101 NRC Project Director: Charles L. Miller Philadelphia Electric Company, Public Service Electric and Gas Company, Delmarva Power and Light Company, and Atlantic City Electric Company, Dockets Nos. 50-277 and 50-278, Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station, Units Nos. 2 and 3, York County, Pennsylvania Date of application for amendments: December 21, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed Technical Specification (TS) changes revise Table 3.2.F, ``Surveillance Instrumentation,'' to accurately describe the main stack high range and reactor building roof vent high range radiation monitors, and deletes previously approved TS Change Request (TSCR) 91-10 for Unit 3 (License Amendment No. 168). TSCR 91-10 requested an emergency temporary change to the TS to allow fuel loading to take place without all control rods fully inserted into the core. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. The proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Because the proposed changes are administrative in nature, they do not affect the initial conditions or precursors assumed in the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report Section 14. These changes do not decrease the effectiveness of equipment relied upon to mitigate the previously evaluated accidents. Therefore, there is no increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. The proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The proposed changes do not make any physical changes to the plant or changes to operating procedures. Therefore, implementation of the proposed changes will not affect the design function or configuration of any component or introduce any new operating scenarios or failure modes or accident initiation. Therefore, the proposed changes do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. 3. The proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The proposed changes are administrative in nature and are intended to provide clarification or eliminate confusion when interpreting the Technical Specifications. The proposed changes do not adversely affect the assumptions or sequence of events used in any accident analysis. Therefore, the proposed changes do not involve a reduction in any margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Government Publications Section, State Library of Pennsylvania, (REGIONAL DEPOSITORY) Education Building, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box 1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105 South Carolina Electric & Gas Company, South Carolina Public Service Authority, Docket No. 50-395, Virgil C. Summer Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Fairfield County, South Carolina Date of amendment request: October 29, 1993 Description of amendment request: The licensee is preparing to replace the currently installed steam generators with new model Delta 75 steam generators (Delta 75 SGs). The new steam generators will be larger than those currently installed. The physical changes to the plant and the accident reanalyses needed to support those changes will necessitate changes to the Technical Specifications (TS). The TS changes requested involve alterations to the core operating limits, changes to various reactor trip setpoints, deletion of the negative flux rate trip, removal of references to specific analyses, changes to the steam/feedwater flow mismatch activation setpoint, changes to shutdown limits, changes to instrument uncertainty allowances, a change to the methodology for reactor coolant system (RCS) flow determination, modifications to departure from nucleate boiling (DNB) parameters, a change to the engineered safety features actuation system setpoints for steam generator water levels, removal of the F* and L* criteria, and the addition of a requirement for a first inservice inspection for the new steam generators. Due to the size of the new steam generators, TS containing references to the maximum containment pressure following a steam line break and the total RCS volume will also change; in addition, a reference to RCS temperature is changed from a nominal value to an indicated value. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), South Carolina Electric & Gas Company (SCE&G or the licensee) has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1) Operation of VCSNS [Virgil C. Summer Nuclear Station] in accordance with the proposed license amendment does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Implementation of the [Delta] 75 SGs and revised operating conditions do not contribute to the initiation of any accident evaluated in the FSAR [Final Safety Analysis Report]. Supporting factors are as follows: - The [Delta] 75 SG is designed in accordance with ASME [American Society of Mechanical Engineers] Code Section III, 1986 edition [sic] and other applicable federal, state, and local laws, codes and regulations and meets the original interfaces for the Model D3 SGs with exception that provisions for a larger blowdown nozzle have been made and the feedwater inlet nozzle is located in the upper shell. - All NSSS [nuclear steam supply system] components (i.e., reactor vessel, RC Pumps, pressurizer, CRDM's [control rod drive mechanisms], [Delta] 75 SGs, and RCS piping) are compatible with the revised operating conditions. Their structural integrity is maintained during all proposed plant conditions through compliance with the ASME code. - Fluid and auxiliary systems which are important to safety are not adversely impacted and will continue to perform their design function. - Overall plant performance and operation are not significantly altered by the proposed changes. Therefore, since the reactor coolant pressure boundary integrity and system functions are not adversely impacted, the probability of occurrence of an accident evaluated in the VCSNS FSAR will be no greater than the original design basis of the plant. An extensive analysis has been performed to evaluate the consequences of the following accident types currently evaluated in the VCSNS FSAR: - Non-LOCA [loss-of-coolant accident] - Large Break LOCA - Steam Generator Tube Rupture With the [Delta] 75 SGs and revised operating conditions, the calculated results (i.e., DNBR [departure from nucleate boiling ratio], Primary and Secondary System Pressure, Peak Clad Temperature, Metal Water Reaction, Challenge to Long Term Cooling, Environmental Conditions Inside and Outside Containment, etc.) for the accidents are similar to those currently reported in the VCSNS FSAR. Select results (i.e., Containment Pressure During a Steam Line Break, Minimum DNBR for Rod Withdrawal from Subcritical, etc.) are slightly more limiting than those reported in the current FSAR due to the use of the assumed operating conditions with the new [Delta] 75 SGs, and in some cases, use of an uprated core power of 2900 MWt. However, in all cases, the calculated results do not challenge the integrity of the primary/secondary/ containment pressure boundary and remain within the regulatory acceptance criteria applied to VCSNS's current licensing basis. The assumptions utilized in the radiological evaluations, described in Section 3.7, are thus appropriate and are judged to provide a conservative estimate of the radiological consequences during accident conditions. Given that calculated radiological consequences are not significantly higher than current FSAR results and remain well within 10CFR100 limits, it is concluded that the consequences of an accident previously evaluated in the FSAR are not increased. 2) The proposed license amendment does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. The [Delta] 75 SGs and revised operating conditions will not introduce any new accident initiator mechanisms. Structural integrity of the RCS is maintained during all plant conditions through compliance with the ASME code. No new failure modes or limiting single failures have been identified. Design requirements of auxiliary systems are met with the RSGs [Replacement Steam Generators]. Since the safety and design requirements continue to be met and the integrity of the reactor coolant system pressure boundary is not challenged, no new accident scenarios have been created. Therefore, the types of accidents defined in the FSAR continue to represent the credible spectrum of events to be analyzed which determine safe plant operation. 3) The proposed license amendment does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. Although the [Delta] 75 SGs and revised operating conditions will require changes to the VCSNS Technical Specifications, it will not invalidate the LOCA, non-LOCA, or SGTR [steam generator tube rupture] conclusions presented in the FSAR accident analyses (Appendix 6). For all the FSAR non-LOCA transients, the DNB design basis, primary and secondary pressure limits, and dose limits continue to be met. The LOCA peak cladding temperatures remain below the limits specified in 10CFR50.46. The calculated doses resulting from a SGTR event will continue to remain within a small fraction of the 10CFR100 permissible releases. Environmental conditions associated with High Energy Line Break (HELB) both inside and outside containment have been evaluated. The containment design pressure will not be violated as a result of the HELB. Equipment qualification will be updated, as necessary, to reflect the revised conditions resulting from HELB. The margin of safety with respect to primary pressure boundary is provided, in part, by the safety factors included in the ASME Code. Since the components remain in compliance with the codes and standards in effect when VCSNS was originally licensed (with the exception of the [Delta] 75 RSGs which use the 1986 ASME Code Section III Edition), the margin of safety is not reduced. Thus, there is no reduction in the margin to safety as defined in the bases of the VCSNS Technical Specifications. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Fairfield County Library, Garden and Washington Streets, Winnsboro, South Carolina 29180 Attorney for licensee: Randolph R. Mahan, South Carolina Electric & Gas Company, Post Office Box 764, Columbia, South Carolina 29218 NRC Project Director: S. Singh Bajwa South Carolina Electric & Gas Company, South Carolina Public Service Authority, Docket No. 50-395, Virgil C. Summer Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, Fairfield County, South Carolina Date of amendment request: December 17, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed changes would revise Technical Specification 3/4.3.3.6, ``Accident Monitoring Instrumentation,'' and the associated Technical Specification Bases. The changes are in accordance with the applicable guidance of Revision 3 to Regulatory Guide (RG) 1.97. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below. The proposed changes would not: (1) Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. Regulatory Guide 1.97 furnishes standards acceptable to the NRC for instrumentation to monitor plant variables and systems during and following an accident. The purpose of the accident monitoring instrumentation is to display plant variables that provide information required by the control room operators for manual actions and long term recovery. Determination of variable types and category designations for VCSNS [Virgil C. Summer Nuclear Station] was accomplished from a review of the Emergency Response Guidelines (ERGs), the Final Safety Analysis Report, and the Westinghouse Owners Group (WOG) ERGs. The WOG ERGs were used at VCSNS as a basis for the Emergency Response Procedures. Operability of the instruments used for accident monitoring ensures there is sufficient information available on selected plant parameters to monitor plant status during and following an accident. The changes proposed do not effect components that can cause an accident. The increase in allowable outage times from 7 to 30 days or from 48 hours to 7 days does not significantly affect the consequences of an event previously evaluated. The channel redundancy and the relatively short outage times, coupled with the low probability of an event requiring accident monitoring instrumentation during this interval, ensure that sufficient information is available for operator manual actions. The condition of the plant in either HOT STANDBY or HOT SHUTDOWN, the first stage of the plant shutdown process, has no impact on the assumptions made in the accident analysis. The change in mode applicability for the Reactor Building Area High Range Radiation Monitors to include modes 1, 2, and 3, but exclude mode 4, is based on the usage of these monitors which is to indicate a significant degradation of the reactor coolant pressure boundary. These monitors do not initiate any automatic mitigation system and are solely required to be operable to provide indication which in conjunction with other operator actions will aid in mitigating the consequences of design basis accidents. Design basis accident sequences which may create a significant degradation of the reactor coolant pressure boundary are not postulated to occur during mode 4. Therefore, the proposed change does not increase the probability or consequences of any accident previously evaluated. (2) Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously evaluated. The proposed change is consistent with the requirements of RG 1.97. The accident monitoring instrumentation will make available reliable information to plant control room operators to mitigate the consequences of a design basis accident. The first stages of plant shutdown, HOT STANDBY and HOT SHUTDOWN, are plant modes for which VCSNS has been analyzed. Since no plant configuration changes or changes to the mode of operation of equipment, systems, and components are introduced by the proposed Technical Specification, no new failure modes or accident sequences are instituted. Therefore, the changes proposed do not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any previously analyzed. (3) Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The inclusion of category 1, type A or B, instrumentation in the TS [Technical Specifications] provides assurance that adequate information is available to the operators to maintain VCSNS in a safe condition during and following a design basis accident. Accomplishment of specific manual action by the control room operators is enhanced due to the availability and reliability of the indications. The proposed changes do not affect the design or operation of safety related components relied upon to automatically mitigate the consequences of a design basis event. The proposed change from HOT SHUTDOWN to HOT STANDBY as the first stage of plant shutdown will not affect the design or operation of any safety related system or component. Therefore, the changes proposed would not involve a reduction in any margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 10 CFR 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Fairfield County Library, Garden and Washington Streets, Winnsboro, South Carolina 29180 Attorney for licensee: Randolph R. Mahan, South Carolina Electric & Gas Company, Post Office Box 764, Columbia, South Carolina 29218 NRC Project Director: S. Singh Bajwa Southern California Edison Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-361 and 50-362, San Onofre Nuclear Generating Station, Unit Nos. 2 and 3, San Diego County, California Date of amendment requests: November 3, 1993 T3Description of amendment requests: The licensee proposes to revise the operability requirements of containment isolation valves listed in Technical Specification (TS) Table 3.6-1, Section D. The associated Bases 3/5.6.3, ``Containment Isolation Valves,'' is also revised. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: 1. Will operation of the facility in accordance with this proposed change involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated? Response: No The proposed change provides new actions and Allowed Outage Times (AOTs) for valves in Section D of Technical Specification (TS) Table 3.6-1 that are currently allowed by the existing TS to be secured for an indefinite period of time as long as they are secured in their Engineered Safety Feature Actuation System (ESFAS) actuated position. These valves are considered operable by the existing TS although they may be unable to perform their containment isolation function. The proposed change ensures that these valves are returned to operable status within specified times based on the results of specific risk evaluations on their contribution to core damage or offsite dose release. The proposed change does not involve a physical change to the facility as described in the Updated Final Safety Analysis Report (UFSAR). Therefore, this proposed change does not involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. 2. Will operation of the facility in accordance with this proposed change create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated? Response: No The ESFAS actuated positions of these valves are the positions assumed in the safety analysis. There are no new accidents associated with this proposed change because the previously analyzed events already considered failures of containment isolation valves. The plant is equipped with dual and redundant containment isolation valves. Leaving the valves in their ESFAS actuated positions does not create a new accident. Therefore, this proposed change does not create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated. 3. Will operation of the facility in accordance with this proposed change involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety? Response: No This proposed change 1) limits the AOT of certain valves based on contributions to core damage and offsite dose release when the valves are secured in their ESFAS actuated position and 2) requires these valves to be returned to OPERABLE status prior to Mode 4 entry from a cold shutdown to ensure they are available to perform their intended containment isolation function. Previously, these valves could be secured in the ESFAS actuated position indefinitely. Therefore, this proposed change does not involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment requests involve no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: Main Library, University of California, P.O. Box 19557, Irvine, California 92713 Attorney for licensee: James A. Beoletto, Esquire, Southern California Edison Company, P. O. Box 800, Rosemead, California 91770 NRC Project Director: Theodore R. Quay Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-338 and 50-339, North Anna Power Station, Units No. 1 and No. 2, Louisa County, Virginia Date of amendment request: December 27, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed change would revise the Technical Specifications (TS) for the North Anna Power Station, Units No. 1 and No. 2 (NA-1&2). The proposed changes revise the review responsibilities of the Station Nuclear Safety and Operating Committee (SNSOC) and the Management Safety Review Committee (MSRC). The NA-1&2 TS address the organization and responsibilities of both the onsite and offsite review groups: SNSOC and MSRC, respectively. The responsibilities of the SNSOC include the review of new procedures and changes to procedures that affect nuclear safety. The MSRC review responsibilities include the review of safety evaluations and SNSOC meeting minutes and reports. The extent of these review activities would be revised by the proposed changes to ensure the two review groups are focusing on nuclear safety issues and not spending an unnecessary amount of time on activities of minimal safety significance. Specifically, the proposed changes would revise the review responsibilities of SNSOC regarding procedure changes. Rather than reviewing all procedure changes, SNSOC would only review procedure changes that require a safety evaluation. The proposed changes also would revise the review responsibilities of the MSRC. Rather than reviewing all of the safety evaluations and SNSOC meeting minutes and reports as presently required by the TS, the MSRC would only review a representative sample of these documents. Basis for proposed no significant hazards consideration determination: As required by 10 CFR 50.91(a), the licensee has provided its analysis of the issue of no significant hazards consideration, which is presented below: [T]he elimination of the SNSOC review of procedure changes that do not require a safety evaluation, revising the wording for approval of procedure changes, and the modification of the MSRC's duties regarding their review of safety evaluations and SNSOC meeting minutes and reports will not: 1. Involve a significant increase in the probability or consequences of an accident previously evaluated. As administrative changes, the proposed Technical Specifications changes have no direct or indirect effect on accident precursors. No plant modifications are being implemented and operation of the plant is unchanged. SNSOC review of new procedures and procedure changes that require a safety evaluation ensures that activities that could affect nuclear safety are being properly reviewed. The MSRC's overview of representative samples of safety evaluations and SNSOC meeting minutes and reports based on performance ensures these programs are being properly implemented and nuclear safety is not being compromised; or 2. Create the possibility of a new or different kind of accident from any accident previously evaluated since physical modifications are not involved and systems and components will be operated as before the change. The proposed changes are wholly administrative in nature and have no impact on plant operations or accident considerations. These changes modify the scope of SNSOC review of procedure changes and MSRC's review functions concerning safety evaluations and SNSOC meeting minutes and reports. Procedure changes will continue to receive management review in accordance with administative procedures, however, only changes that require a safety evaluation will require SNSOC approval. MSRC review of representative samples of safety evaluations and SNSOC meeting minutes and reports based on performance will continue to provide adequate assurance that nuclear safety is being properly considered; or 3. Involve a significant reduction in a margin of safety as defined in the basis of any Technical Specification since the responsibilities of the SNSOC and MSRC are not addressed by the existing Technical Specification Bases, nor are review requirements for procedures. The proposed changes are administrative in nature and have no impact on, nor were they considered in, existing UFSAR accident analyses. Safety significant procedure changes, i.e., changes that require a safety evaluation to be prepared, will continue to be reviewed by SNSOC, as will new procedures. Procedure changes still require cognizant management approval and preparation of an activity screening to determine whether or not the change impacts nuclear safety. This ensures activities important to nuclear safety are being appropriately reviewed. The effectiveness of the safety evaluation program, and the thoroughness of SNSOC meetings and reports will be assured through the MSRC's plant overview function which is based on observed performance. The NRC staff has reviewed the licensee's analysis and, based on this review, it appears that the three standards of 50.92(c) are satisfied. Therefore, the NRC staff proposes to determine that the amendment request involves no significant hazards consideration. Local Public Document Room location: The Alderman Library, Special Collections Department, University of Virginia, Charlottesville, Virginia 22903-2498. Attorney for licensee: Michael W. Maupin, Esq., Hunton and Williams, Riverfront Plaza, East Tower, 951 E. Byrd Street, Richmond, Virginia 23219 NRC Project Director: Herbert N. Berkow Previously Published Notices Of Consideration Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses, Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination, And opportunity For A Hearing The following notices were previously published as separate individual notices. The notice content was the same as above. They were published as individual notices either because time did not allow the Commission to wait for this biweekly notice or because the action involved exigent circumstances. They are repeated here because the biweekly notice lists all amendments issued or proposed to be issued involving no significant hazards consideration. For details, see the individual notice in the Federal Register on the day and page cited. This notice does not extend the notice period of the original notice. Duke Power Company, Docket No. 50-413, Catawba Nuclear Station, Unit No. 1, York County, South Carolina Date of amendment request: January 10, 1994 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would revise Technical Specifications 2.0 and 3/4.2 which currently requires the determination of the reactor coolant system flow rate by precision heat balance measurement at least once per 18 months. Date of publication of individual notice in Federal Register: January 26, 1994 (59 FR 3743) Expiration date of individual notice: February 25, 1994 Local Public Document Room location: York County Library, 138 East Black Street, Rock Hill, South Carolina 29730 Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-269, 50-270 and 50-287, Oconee Nuclear Station, Units 1, 2 and 3, Oconee County, South Carolina Date of amendment request: November 11, 1993, as supplemented November 22, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendments would provide an interim acceptance criteria for control rod drop time on Oconee Unit 1. Specifically, control rod Group 1, Rod 8, and Group 2, Rod 5, would be considered operable with an insertion time of less than or equal to 3.00 seconds provided that: (1) the average insertion time for the remaining rods in Group 1 and the average insertion time for the remaining rods in Group 2 is less than or equal to 1.5 seconds, and (2) the core average negative reactivity insertion rate is within the assumptions of the safety analysis. The acceptance criteria would apply until the end of the current fuel cycle for Oconee Unit 1. This acceptance criteria for rod drop time would apply for the two rods, rather than the existing Technical Specification 4.7.1 limit of 2.00 seconds from the fully withdrawn position to 3/4 insertion. Date of publication of individual notice in Federal Register: November 29, 1993 (58 FR 62689) Expiration date of individual notice: December 29, 1993 Local Public Document Room location: Oconee County Library, 501 West South Broad Street, Walhalla, South Carolina 29691 Gulf States Utilities Company, Cajun Electric Power Cooperative, and Entergy Operations, Inc., Docket No. 50-458, River Bend Station, Unit 1, West Feliciana Parish, Louisiana Date of application for amendment: December 8, 1993 #I11#T3Brief description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would grant one-time extensions for certain Technical Specification surveillances which are currently required to be performed beginning February 16, 1994. The licensee is requesting extension of the surveillance intervals because the current operating cycle has been extended, impacting the required completion dates for these surveillances. Performance of these surveillances within the required intervals would require that the plant be placed in an undesirable operating configuration, or would necessitate a plant shutdown. The surveillances for which extensions have been requested will be performed during the fifth refueling outage, scheduled to begin on April 16, 1994. Date of individual notice in Federal Register: January 18, 1994 (59 FR 2630) Expiration date of individual notice: February 17, 1994 Local Public Document Room location: Government Documents Department, Louisiana State University, Baton Rouge, Louisiana 70803 Power Authority of the State of New York, Docket No. 50-333, James A. FitzPatrick Nuclear Power Plant, Oswego County, New York Date of amendment request: December 22, 1993 Description of amendment request: The proposed amendment would add Limiting Conditions for Operation (LCO) and Surveillance Requirements to Tables 3.12.1, ``Water Spray/Sprinkler Protected Areas,'' and 4.12.1, ``Water Spray/Sprinkler Tests,'' and clarify the associated Bases to reflect the installation of a new full area fire suppression system in the east and west cable tunnels. This new full area fire suppression system was installed because the previous sprinkler system did not provide coverage to some cable trays and the sprinkler head orientation did not provide full coverage of the cable trays where it was installed. The proposed amendment would also correct other portions of Tables 3.12.1 and 4.12.1 for consistency with changes made to reflect the east and west cable tunnel modification. Date of publication of individual notice in Federal Register: January 18, 1994 (59 FR 2634) Expiration date of individual notice: February 17, 1994 Local Public Document Room location: Reference and Documents Department, Penfield Library, State University of New York, Oswego, New York 13126. Notice Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commission has issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined for each of these amendments that the application complies with the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment to Facility Operating License, Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination, and Opportunity for A Hearing in connection with these actions was published in the Federal Register as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendments satisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR 51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impact statement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments. If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the special circumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determination based on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the applications for amendment, (2) the amendment, and (3) the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or Environmental Assessment as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspection at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555, and at the local public document rooms for the particular facilities involved. Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-369 and 50-370, McGuire Nuclear Station, Units 1 and 2, Mecklenburg County, North Carolina Date of application for amendments: October 28, 1992, as supplemented December 14, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The amendments remove Table 4.4-5, ``Reactor Vessel Material Surveillance Program Withdrawal Schedule,'' from the McGuire Technical Specifications and make other administrative changes associated with the removal of the withdrawal schedule in accordance with NRC Generic Letter 91-01. Date of issuance: January 31, 1994 Effective date: January 31, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 139 and 121 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-9 and NPF-17: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: December 23, 1992 (57 FR 61112) The December 14, 1993, letter provided clarifying information that did not change the scope of the October 28, 1992, application and the initial proposed no significant hazards consideration determination. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 31, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Astkins Library, University of North Carolina, Charlotte (UNCC Station), North Carolina 28223 Duke Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-269, 50-270, and 50-287, Oconee Nuclear Station, Units 1, 2, and 3, Oconee County, South Carolina Date of application of amendments: July 14, 1993, as supplemented August 24 and September 22, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The amendments revise TS 3.1.2.9 to clarify the role of High Pressure Injection and Core Flood Tank deactivation in maintaining pilot operated relief valve operability for low temperature overpressure protection (LTOP), add restrictions regarding applicability of controls which assure 10 minutes are available for operator action to mitigate an LTOP event, revise the pressure-temperature limits and associated LTOP setpoints, and make associated administrative changes. Also, the Bases would be revised to be consistent with the above changes. The conformance of the upper shelf energy and reactor vessel material surveillance program to Appendices G and H will be determined pending the NRC staff resolution of Generic Letter 92-01 in 1994. Date of issuance: January 25, 1994 Effective date: To be issued within 30 days from the date of issuance Amendment Nos.: 204, 204, and 201 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-38, DPR-47, and DPR-55: The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: September 1, 1993 (58 FR 46228) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 25, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Oconee County Library, 501 West South Broad Street, Walhalla, South Carolina 29691 Duquesne Light Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-334 and 50-412, Beaver Valley Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Shippingport, Pennsylvania Date of application for amendments: February 19, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The amendments revise the Appendix A TSs 3.4.9.1, 3.4.9.2, and 4.4.9.2 relating to pressurizer surge line stratification. Date of issuance: January 31, 1994 Effective date: January 31, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 179 and 59 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-66 and NPF-73: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: Aspril 28, 1993 (58 FR 25854) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 31, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: B. F. Jones Memorial Library, 663 Franklin Avenue, Aliquippa, Pennsylvania 15001. Entergy Operations, Inc., Docket No. 50-368, Arkansas Nuclear One, Unit No. 2, Pope County, Arkansas Date of application for amendment: February 24, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revised the containment internal pressure lower limit of Technical Specification Figure 3.6-1 from 12.8 to 13.2 psia. Date of issuance: February 3, 1994 Effective date: 30-days from date of issuance Amendment No.: 156 Facility Operating License No. NPF-6. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: March 31, 1993 (58 FR 16858) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February 3, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Tomlinson Library, Arkansas Tech University, Russellville, Arkansas 72801. Florida Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-250 and 50-251, Turkey Point Plant Units 3 and 4, Dade County, Florida Date of application for amendments: October 4, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The amendments revise the surveillance test schedule in TS 4.6.1.2a and the associated Bases for performing Type A test which determine the overall integrated containment leakage rate. Date of issuance: January 11, 1994 Effective date: January 11, 1994 Amendment Nos. 158, 152 Facility Operating Licenses Nos. DPR-31 and DPR-41: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: November 10, 1993 (58 FR 59748) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 11, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Florida International University, University Park, Miami, Florida 33199. Houston Lighting & Power Company, City Public Service Board of San Antonio, Central Power and Light Company, City of Austin, Texas, Docket No. 50-498, South Texas Project, Unit 1, Matagorda County, Texas Date of amendment request: December 6, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The amendments modify Technical Specification 3.7.1.2 by extending the allowed outage time for the Unit 1 Train D turbine-driven auxiliary feedwater pump from 72 hours to 168 hours. This change is a one-time-only extension to accommodate an augmented test program for the turbine driven auxiliary feedwater pump during the restart of Unit 1 from the 1993 outage. Date of issuance: January 25, 1994 Effective date: January 25, 1994, to be implemented within 10 days of issuance. Amendment No.: 58 Facility Operating License No. NPF-76. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: December 22, 1993 (58 FR 67848). The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 25, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Wharton County Junior College, J. M. Hodges Learning Center, 911 Boling Highway, Wharton, Texas 77488 Illinois Power Company and Soyland Power Cooperative, Inc., Docket No. 50-461, Clinton Power Station, Unit No. 1, DeWitt County, Illinois Date of application for amendment: November 4, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises Clinton Technical Specification 3/4.8.1.1, ``AC Sources - Operating,'' by relocating the surveillance requirement to inspect the diesel generators in accordance with the manufacturer's recommendations to the preventive maintenance program. Date of issuance: January 31, 1994 Effective date: January 31, 1994 Amendment No.: 87 Facility Operating License No. NPF-62. The amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: December 8, 1993 (58 FR 64610) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 31, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: The Vespasian Warner Public Library District, 310 N. Quincy Street, Clinton, Illinois 61727. Illinois Power Company and Soyland Power Cooperative, Inc., Docket No. 50-461, Clinton Power Station, Unit No. 1, DeWitt County, Illinois Date of application for amendment: November 4, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The licensee proposed modifying Technical Specification 3/4.8.2.1, ``DC Sources - Operating,'' by deleting the requirement that the plant be shut down to perform the required battery capacity or service testing. Following discussions with the licensee, the staff has modified the licensee's proposal and approved a one-time only change to permit replacement of the Division IV battery subsystem at power. Date of issuance: February 2, 1994 Effective date: February 2, 1994 Amendment No.: 88 Facility Operating License No. NPF-62. The amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: December 8, 1993 (58 FR 64610) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February 2, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: The Vespasian Warner Public Library, 120 West Johnson Street, Clinton, Illinois 61727. Indiana Michigan Power Company, Docket No. 50-316, Donald C. Cook, Nuclear Plant, Unit No. 2, Berrien County, Michigan Date of application for amendment: Aspril 16, 1993, as supplemented September 28 and December 3, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises Technical Specifications to allow certain tests normally designated as 18-month surveillances to be delayed until the next refueling outage scheduled to begin August 6, 1994. Extensions for four groups of surveillances (Groups 1, 2, 6, 11) were previously approved for Unit 2 in Amendment 158 dated December 22, 1993. This amendment grants approval for the extensions requested for the remaining 12 groups of surveillances and completes the staff's review of the licensee's April 16, 1993 (as supplemented) application. Date of issuance: January 26, 1994 Effective date: January 26, 1994 Amendment No.: 159 Facility Operating License No. DPR-74. Amendment revises the Technical Specifications. Dates of initial notice in Federal Register: Asugust 4, 1993 (58 FR 41505) and December 21, 1993 (58 FR 67850) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 26, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Maud Preston Palenske Memorial Library, 500 Market Street, St. Joseph, Michigan 49085. Northeast Nuclear Energy Company, et al., Docket No. 50-336, Millstone Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 2, New London County, Connecticut Date of application for amendment: June 11, 1993, supplemented by letter dated November 15, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises the pressure/ temperature (P/T) limits for the reactor vessel. Specifically, Figure 3.4-2, ``Millstone Unit 2 Reactor Coolant System Presure-Temperature Limitations for 12 Full Power Years,'' on page 3/4 4-19, is revised to reflect the change in the curves and the title change to ``Millstone Unit 2 Reactor Coolant System Pressure-Temperature Limitations for 20 EFPY.'' Date of issuance: January 27, 1994 Effective date: As of the date of issuance to be implemented within 30 days. Amendment No.: 170 Facility Operating License No. DPR-65. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: July 21, 1993 (58 FR 39054) The November 15, 1993, submittal provided information that did not change the initial proposed no significant hazards consideration determination. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 27, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Learning Resource Center, Three Rivers Community-Technical College, Thames Valley Campus, 574 New London Turnpike, Norwich, Connecticut 06360. Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-275 and 50-323, Diablo Canyon Nuclear Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, San Luis Obispo County, California Date of application for amendments: December 22, 1992, as supplemented July 19, 1993 (Reference LAR 92-08) Brief description of amendments: The amendments revise the combined Technical Specifications (TS) for the Diablo Canyon Power Plant Unit Nos. 1 and 2. Specifically, TS Section 3/4.3.2, ``Engineered Safety Features Actuation System Instrumentation,'' would be revised to change the second level undervoltage trip setpoint and allowable values. Technical Specification 3/4.8.1, ``A.C. Sources,'' would also be changed to revise the diesel generator (DG) steady state voltage surveillance requirements. The second level undervoltage relay TS setpoint and allowable values will be changed to maintain acceptable voltages at the 480 volt and 120 volt buses during sustained degraded voltage conditions. The DG steady state voltage surveillance requirements will be changed to ensure that the diesel generators provide adequate voltage when required to power the vital loads. Date of issuance: January 6, 1994 Effective date: 60 days from date of issuance Amendment Nos.: 86 & 85 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-80 and DPR-82: The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: February 3, 1993 (58 FR 7002) The July 19, 1993 submittal provided clarifying information and did not affect the initial Federal Register notice and proposed no significant hazards consideration. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 6, 1994 No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: California Polytechnic State University, Robert E. Kennedy Library, Government Documents and Maps Department, San Luis Obispo, California 93407. Pacific Gas and Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-275 and 50-323, Diablo Canyon Nuclear Power Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, San Luis Obispo County, California Date of application for amendments: July 6, 1993, as supplemented December 29, 1993 (Reference LAR 93-03) Brief description of amendments: The amendments revise the combined Technical Specifications (TS) 3/4.3.2, ``Engineered Safety Features Actuation System Instrumentation,'' Table 4.3-2, ``Engineered Safety Features Actuation System Instrumentation Surveillance Requirements,'' for the Diablo Canyon Power Plant Unit Nos. 1 and 2 to relax the slave relay test frequency for slave relays K612A, K614B, K615A, and K615B from quarterly to once per 18 months during refueling or extended cold shutdowns. The affected slave relays cause isolation of the charging and letdown portions of the chemical and volume control system, and actuate charging pump suction valves associated with volume control tank and refueling water storage tank isolation. Date of issuance: January 31, 1994 Effective date: For cycle 7 and after Amendment Nos.: 87 and 86 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-80 and DPR-82: The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: Asugust 18, 1993 (58 FR 43929) The December 29, 1993, submittal provided clarifying information and did not effect the initial Federal Register Notice and proposed no significant hazards consideration. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 31, 1994. No significan hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: California Polytechnic State University, Robert E. Kennedy Library, Government Documents and Maps Department, San Luis Obispo, California 93407. Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket Nos. 50-387 and 50-388 Susquehanna Steam Electric Station, Units 1 and 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania Date of application for amendments: January 9, 1991, as supplemented on August 19, 1991, June 22, 1992 and August 3, 1992 Brief description of amendments: The amendment changed the Technical Specifications to revise the isolation setpoints for the ambient temperature switches for the High Pressure Coolant Injection and Reactor Core Isolation Cooling Systems room area coolers. Date of issuance: January 31, 1993 Effective date: January 31, 1993 Amendment Nos.: 132 and 99 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-14 and NPF-22. These amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: June 9, 1993 (58 FR 32389) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 31, 1993. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Osterhout Free Library, Reference Department, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18701. Philadelphia Electric Company, Docket No. 50-353, Limerick Generating Station, Unit 2, Montgomery County, Pennsylvania Date of application for amendment: Asugust 27, 1993, as supplemented November 10, and December 20, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment allows a one-time TS change to extend the allowed outage time (AOTs) for the Unit 2 residual heat removal service water (RHRSW) system as well as the suppression pool spray and suppression pool cooling modes of the residual heat removal system from 72, 168 (i.e. seven days), and 72 hours, respectively, to 288 hours (i.e., twelve days). The extended AOTs would allow continued Unit 2 operation while maintenance isolation valves are installed on both loops of the RHRSW system. Date of issuance: January 26, 1994 Effective date: January 26, 1994 Amendment No. 30 Facility Operating License No. NPF-85. This amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: September 29, 1993 (58 FR 50970) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 26, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Pottstown Public Library, 500 High Street, Pottstown, Pennsylvania 19464. Philadelphia Electric Company, Public Service Electric and Gas Company Delmarva Power and Light Company, and Atlantic City Electric Company, Docket Nos. 50-277 and 50-278, Peach Bottom Atomic Power Station, Unit Nos. 2 and 3, York County, Pennsylvania Date of application for amendments: October 5, 1993 Brief description of amendments: This amendment revised the Plant Operating Review Committee review, the Nuclear Review Board review, the Radiological Environmental Monitoring Program requirements, position titles, and the organization chart in Appendix B of the Technical Specifications (TS) to be consistent with Appendix A of the TS. Date of issuance: January 26, 1994 Effective date: January 26, 1994 Amendments Nos.: 183 and 188 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-44 and DPR-56: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: December 8, 1993 (58 FR 64612) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 26, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Government Publications Section, State Library of Pennsylvania, (REGIONAL DEPOSITORY) Education Building, Walnut Street and Commonwealth Avenue, Box 1601, Harrisburg, Pennsylvania 17105. Public Service Electric & Gas Company, Docket No. 50-354, Hope Creek Generating Station, Salem County, New Jersey Date of application for amendment: February 2, 1993, and supplemented by letter dated November 16, 1993. Brief description of amendment: The amendment extends the period of time to reduce the setpoints of the Average Power Range Monitors and the Rod Block Monitor when the plant enters single-loop operations. Additionally, the change incorporates updated core values relative to single loop operations and the addition of a new Specification 3.0.5 and its associated Bases. Date of issuance: January 25, 1994 Effective date: As of date of issuance and shall be implemented within 60 days of the date of issuance. Amendment No.: 63 Facility Operating License No. NPF-57: This amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: March 31, 1993 (58 FR 16872) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 25, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Pennsville Public Library, 190 S. Broadway, Pennsville, New Jersey 08070 Public Service Electric & Gas Company, Docket No. 50-354, Hope Creek Generating Station, Salem County, New Jersey Date of application for amendment: May 21, 1993, as supplemented on October 29, 1993, and November 16, 1993; the staff's proposed finding of no significant hazards is not affected by these supplements. Brief description of amendment: This amendment revises Technical Specifications surveillance requirement 4.4.2.2 to apply only to the pilot stage assembly of the safety relief valves (SRVs) and adds a new surveillance requirement which will require the main portion of the SRVs to be set pressure tested at least once every 5 years. Date of issuance: January 27, 1994 Effective date: January 27, 1994 Amendment No.: 64 Facility Operating License No. NPF-57: This amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: Asugust 18, 1993 (58 FR 43931) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 27, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Pennsville Public Library, 190 S. Broadway, Pennsville, New Jersey 08070 Public Service Electric & Gas Company, Docket No. 50-354, Hope Creek Generating Station, Salem County, New Jersey Date of application for amendment: May 21, 1993 as supplemented on August 23, 1993. Brief description of amendment: This amendment revised a Technical Specification surveillance requirement to increase the voltage limit from 4580 to 4785 volts when performing the 18-month emergency diesel generator full load rejection test. Date of issuance: February 4, 1994 Effective date: Effective as of date of issuance and to be implemented upon restart following fifth refueling outage currently scheduled to begin on March 5, 1994. Amendment No.: 65 Facility Operating License No. NPF-57: This amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: June 23, 1993 (58 FR 34091) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February 4, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Pennsville Public Library, 190 S. Broadway, Pennsville, New Jersey 08070 Public Service Electric & Gas Company, Docket No. 50-311, Salem Nuclear Generating Station, Unit No. 2, Salem County, New Jersey Date of application for amendment: Asugust 30, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment changes the main feedwater system containment isolation valves from the feedwater control and control bypass valves to the feedwater stop check valves. Date of issuance: January 21, 1994 Effective date: As of date of issuance and shall be implemented within 60 days of the date of issuance Amendment No. 128 Facility Operating License No. DPR-75: This amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: September 29, 1993 (58 FR50974) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 21, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Salem Free Public Library, 112 West Broadway, Salem, New Jersey 08079 Southern California Edison Company, et al., Docket Nos. 50-361 and 50-362, San Onofre Nuclear Generating Station, Unit Nos. 2 and 3, San Diego County, California Date of application for amendments: November 25, 1991 Brief description of amendments: These amendments revise Technical Specification (TS) 3/4.7.8, ``Fire Suppression Systems.'' This TS revision deletes the phrase ``during shutdown'' from the fire pump diesel engine surveillance requirement 4.7.8.1.2.c. This will allow the surveillance of the fire pump diesel engine to be performed when one or both Units 2 and 3 are in operation. Date of issuance: February 1, 1994 Effective date: February 1, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 109 and 98 Facility Operating License Nos. NPF-10 and NPF-15: The amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: January 22, 1992 (57 FR 2600) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February 1, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Main Library, University of California, P. O. Box 19557, Irvine, California 92713. Tennessee Valley Authority, Docket Nos. 50-259, 50-260 and 50-296, Browns Ferry Nuclear Plant, Units 1, 2 and 3, Limestone County, Alabama Date of application for amendments: September 30, 1993 (TS 345) Brief description of amendment: The amendment deletes conditions from the Browns Ferry Units 1, 2, and 3 licenses which require maintenance of positive access controls for the containment in accordance with 10 CFR 73.55(d)(8), and deletes a redundant condition from the Unit 3 license. Date of issuance: February 1, 1994 Effective date: February 1, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 202 - Unit 1; 221 - Unit 2; 175 - Unit 3 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-33, DPR-52 and DPR-68: Amendment revises the license conditions. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: December 8, 1993 (58 FR 64616) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February 1, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: None Local Public Document Room location: Asthens Public Library, South Street, Athens, Alabama 35611. Toledo Edison Company, Centerior Service Company, and The Cleveland Electric Illuminating Company, Docket No. 50-346, Davis-Besse Nuclear Power Station, Unit No. 1, Ottawa County, Ohio Date of application for amendment: May 6, 1993 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises the reporting frequency requirements from semiannual to annual for submission to the NRC of the Radioactive Effluent Release Report, and clarifies the reporting requirements regarding steam generator tube inspection Category C-3 results. Date of issuance: December 30, 1993 Effective date: December 30, 1993 Amendment No.: 184 Facility Operating License No. NPF-3. Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: June 23, 1993 (58 FR 34096) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated December 30, 1993. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: University of Toledo Library, Documents Department, 2801 Bancroft Avenue, Toledo, Ohio 43606. Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281, Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia. Date of application for amendments: July 16, 1993, as supplemented November 15, 1993. The November 15, 1993, submittal did not expand the scope of the original application and did not change the proposed no significant hazards consideration determination. Brief description of amendments: These amendments implement the revised 10 CFR Part 20, Standards for Protection Against Radiation, and reflect revisions to 10 CFR 50.36a. Date of issuance: January 25, 1994 Effective date: January 25, 1994 Amendment Nos. 185 and 185 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-32 and DPR-37: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: Asugust 18, 1993 (58 FR 43937) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 25, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Swem Library, College of William and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185. Virginia Electric and Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-280 and 50-281, Surry Power Station, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Surry County, Virginia. Date of application for amendments: March 19, 1993, as supplemented December 9, 1993. Brief description of amendments: These amendments address plant operation with a control rod urgent alarm failure, a change in the control rod assembly partial movement surveillance test frequency, and proposed administrative changes. Date of issuance: February 4, 1994 Effective date: February 4, 1994 Amendment Nos. 186 and 186 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-32 and DPR-37: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: May 12, 1993 (58 FR 28064) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February 4, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No Local Public Document Room location: Swem Library, College of William and Mary, Williamsburg, Virginia 23185. Wisconsin Electric Power Company, Docket Nos. 50-266 and 50-301 Point Beach Nuclear Plant, Unit Nos. 1 and 2, Town of Two Creeks, Manitowoc County, Wisconsin Date of application for amendments: January 14, 1993 Brief description of amendments: The amendments split Technical Specification (TS) 15.3.1.E.2, which defines the allowable limits of chloride and fluoride in the reactor coolant, into two individual Limiting Conditions for Operation (LCOs), thus clarifying the reactor coolant chemistry limitations. In addition, the amendments added a 24-hour hot shutdown action statement to the reactor coolant impurity limit LCOs. The amendments also modified the corresponding TS Bases Section. Date of issuance: January 27, 1994 Effective date: January 27, 1994 Amendment Nos.: 145 and 149 Facility Operating License Nos. DPR-24 and DPR-27: Amendments revised the Technical Specifications. Date of initial notice in Federal Register: March 3, 1993 (58 FR 12270) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendments is contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 27, 1994. No significant hazards consideration comments received: No. Local Public Document Room location: Joseph P. Mann Library, 1516 Sixteenth Street, Two Rivers, Wisconsin 54241. Notice Of Issuance Of Amendments To Facility Operating Licenses And Final Determination Of No Significant Hazards Consideration And Opportunity For A Hearing (Exigent Public Announcement Or Emergency Circumstances) During the period since publication of the last biweekly notice, the Commission has issued the following amendments. The Commission has determined for each of these amendments that the application for the amendment complies with the standards and requirements of the Atomic Energy Act of 1954, as amended (the Act), and the Commission's rules and regulations. The Commission has made appropriate findings as required by the Act and the Commission's rules and regulations in 10 CFR Chapter I, which are set forth in the license amendment. Because of exigent or emergency circumstances associated with the date the amendment was needed, there was not time for the Commission to publish, for public comment before issuance, its usual 30-day Notice of Consideration of Issuance of Amendment, Proposed No Significant Hazards Consideration Determination, and Opportunity for a Hearing. For exigent circumstances, the Commission has either issued a Federal Register notice providing opportunity for public comment or has used local media to provide notice to the public in the area surrounding a licensee's facility of the licensee's application and of the Commission's proposed determination of no significant hazards consideration. The Commission has provided a reasonable opportunity for the public to comment, using its best efforts to make available to the public means of communication for the public to respond quickly, and in the case of telephone comments, the comments have been recorded or transcribed as appropriate and the licensee has been informed of the public comments. In circumstances where failure to act in a timely way would have resulted, for example, in derating or shutdown of a nuclear power plant or in prevention of either resumption of operation or of increase in power output up to the plant's licensed power level, the Commission may not have had an opportunity to provide for public comment on its no significant hazards consideration determination. In such case, the license amendment has been issued without opportunity for comment. If there has been some time for public comment but less than 30 days, the Commission may provide an opportunity for public comment. If comments have been requested, it is so stated. In either event, the State has been consulted by telephone whenever possible. Under its regulations, the Commission may issue and make an amendment immediately effective, notwithstanding the pendency before it of a request for a hearing from any person, in advance of the holding and completion of any required hearing, where it has determined that no significant hazards consideration is involved. The Commission has applied the standards of 10 CFR 50.92 and has made a final determination that the amendment involves no significant hazards consideration. The basis for this determination is contained in the documents related to this action. Accordingly, the amendments have been issued and made effective as indicated. Unless otherwise indicated, the Commission has determined that these amendments satisfy the criteria for categorical exclusion in accordance with 10 CFR 51.22. Therefore, pursuant to 10 CFR 51.22(b), no environmental impact statement or environmental assessment need be prepared for these amendments. If the Commission has prepared an environmental assessment under the special circumstances provision in 10 CFR 51.12(b) and has made a determination based on that assessment, it is so indicated. For further details with respect to the action see (1) the application for amendment, (2) the amendment to Facility Operating License, and (3) the Commission's related letter, Safety Evaluation and/or Environmental Assessment, as indicated. All of these items are available for public inspection at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555, and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. The Commission is also offering an opportunity for a hearing with respect to the issuance of the amendment. By March 18, 1994, the licensee may file a request for a hearing with respect to issuance of the amendment to the subject facility operating license and any person whose interest may be affected by this proceeding and who wishes to participate as a party in the proceeding must file a written request for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene. Requests for a hearing and a petition for leave to intervene shall be filed in accordance with the Commission's ``Rules of Practice for Domestic Licensing Proceedings'' in 10 CFR Part 2. Interested persons should consult a current copy of 10 CFR 2.714 which is available at the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555 and at the local public document room for the particular facility involved. If a request for a hearing or petition for leave to intervene is filed by the above date, the Commission or an Atomic Safety and Licensing Board, designated by the Commission or by the Chairman of the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board Panel, will rule on the request and/or petition; and the Secretary or the designated Atomic Safety and Licensing Board will issue a notice of a hearing or an appropriate order. As required by 10 CFR 2.714, a petition for leave to intervene shall set forth with particularity the interest of the petitioner in the proceeding, and how that interest may be affected by the results of the proceeding. The petition should specifically explain the reasons why intervention should be permitted with particular reference to the following factors: (1) the nature of the petitioner's right under the Act to be made a party to the proceeding; (2) the nature and extent of the petitioner's property, financial, or other interest in the proceeding; and (3) the possible effect of any order which may be entered in the proceeding on the petitioner's interest. The petition should also identify the specific aspect(s) of the subject matter of the proceeding as to which petitioner wishes to intervene. Any person who has filed a petition for leave to intervene or who has been admitted as a party may amend the petition without requesting leave of the Board up to 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, but such an amended petition must satisfy the specificity requirements described above. Not later than 15 days prior to the first prehearing conference scheduled in the proceeding, a petitioner shall file a supplement to the petition to intervene which must include a list of the contentions which are sought to be litigated in the matter. Each contention must consist of a specific statement of the issue of law or fact to be raised or controverted. In addition, the petitioner shall provide a brief explanation of the bases of the contention and a concise statement of the alleged facts or expert opinion which support the contention and on which the petitioner intends to rely in proving the contention at the hearing. The petitioner must also provide references to those specific sources and documents of which the petitioner is aware and on which the petitioner intends to rely to establish those facts or expert opinion. Petitioner must provide sufficient information to show that a genuine dispute exists with the applicant on a material issue of law or fact. Contentions shall be limited to matters within the scope of the amendment under consideration. The contention must be one which, if proven, would entitle the petitioner to relief. A petitioner who fails to file such a supplement which satisfies these requirements with respect to at least one contention will not be permitted to participate as a party. Those permitted to intervene become parties to the proceeding, subject to any limitations in the order granting leave to intervene, and have the opportunity to participate fully in the conduct of the hearing, including the opportunity to present evidence and cross-examine witnesses. Since the Commission has made a final determination that the amendment involves no significant hazards consideration, if a hearing is requested, it will not stay the effectiveness of the amendment. Any hearing held would take place while the amendment is in effect. A request for a hearing or a petition for leave to intervene must be filed with the Secretary of the Commission, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, Attention: Docketing and Services Branch, or may be delivered to the Commission's Public Document Room, the Gelman Building, 2120 L Street, NW., Washington, DC 20555, by the above date. Where petitions are filed during the last 10 days of the notice period, it is requested that the petitioner promptly so inform the Commission by a toll-free telephone call to Western Union at 1-(800) 248-5100 (in Missouri 1-(800) 342-6700). The Western Union operator should be given Datagram Identification Number N1023 and the following message addressed to (Project Director): petitioner's name and telephone number, date petition was mailed, plant name, and publication date and page number of this Federal Register notice. A copy of the petition should also be sent to the Office of the General Counsel, U.S. Nuclear Regulatory Commission, Washington, DC 20555, and to the attorney for the licensee. Nontimely filings of petitions for leave to intervene, amended petitions, supplemental petitions and/or requests for a hearing will not be entertained absent a determination by the Commission, the presiding officer or the Atomic Safety and Licensing Board that the petition and/or request should be granted based upon a balancing of the factors specified in 10 CFR 2.714(a)(1)(i)-(v) and 2.714(d). Gulf States Utilities Company, Cajun Electric Power Cooperative, and Entergy Operations, Inc., Docket No. 50-458, River Bend Station, Unit 1, West Feliciana Parish, Louisiana Date of amendment request: November 18, 1993, as supplemented by letter dated December 21, 1993. Brief description of amendment: The amendment revises the River Bend, Unit 1 Technical Specifications to permit extending the time to perform leak rate testing of certain containment isolation valves and pressure isolation valves so that the testing can be performed during the refueling outage scheduled to start April 16, 1994, rather than requiring an earlier shutdown solely to perform the testing. Also, an exemption to 10 CFR Appendix J was issued on February 2, 1994, that provides an extension, consistent with the revision to the technical specifications, to allow the testing of containment isolation valves to be delayed until the refueling outage. Date of issuance: February 2, 1994 Effective date: February 2, 1994 Amendment No.: Asmendment No. 71 Facility Operating License No. NPF-47: The amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration: Yes. January 5, 1994 (59 FR 616) The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment, finding of emergency circumstances, and final determination of no significant hazards consideration are contained in a Safety Evaluation dated February 2, 1994. Attorney for licensee: Mark Wetterhahn, Esq., Bishop, Cook, Purcell and Reynolds, 1401 L Street, NW., Washington, D.C. 20005 Local Public Document Room location: Government Documents Department, Louisiana State University, Baton Rouge, Louisiana 70803. Pennsylvania Power and Light Company, Docket No. 50-388, Susquehanna Steam Electric Station, Unit 2, Luzerne County, Pennsylvania Date of application for amendment: January 24, 1994 Brief description of amendment: The amendment revised the applicability requirement in Sections 3.0.4, 4.0.4, 3.3.7.5 Action 80, 4.3.7.5, 3.4.2 Action c, and 4.4.2 of the Technical Specifications to permit Susquehanna, Unit 2 to continue to operate with the acoustic monitor on the ``S'' safety/relief valve tailpipe inoperable. Date of issuance: January 31, 1994 Effective date: As of its date of issuance and will remain in effect until the next shutdown of sufficient duration to allow for containment entry, not to exceed the sixth refueling and inspection outage. Amendment No.: 100 Facility Operating License No. NPF-22: Amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Public comments requested as to proposed no significant hazards consideration: No. On January 27, 1994, the staff issued a Notice of Enforcement Discretion, which was immediately effective and remained in effect until this amendment was issued. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment, finding of emergency circumstances, consultation with the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania and final no significant hazards considerations determination are contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 31, 1994. Attorney for licensee: Jay Silberg, Esq., Shaw, Pittman, Potts & Trowbridge 2300 N Street NW., Washington, D.C. 20037 Local Public Document Room location: Osterhout Free Library, Reference Department, 71 South Franklin Street, Wilkes-Barre, Pennsylvania 18071. Washington Public Power Supply System, Docket No. 50-397, Nuclear Project No. 2, Benton County, Washington Date of application for amendment: January 13, 1994 Brief description of amendment: The amendment modified the Technical Specifications (TS) to defer response time testing for low pressure emergency core cooling systems (ECCS) until startup following the next cold shutdown, but not later than the startup following completion of the spring 1994 refueling outage. Date of issuance: January 31, 1994 Effective date: January 31, 1994 Amendment No.: 120 Facility Operating License No. NPF-21: The amendment revised the Technical Specifications. Public comments on proposed no significant hazards consideration comments received: No. The Commission's related evaluation of the amendment, finding of emergency circumstances, and final determination of no significant hazards consideration are contained in a Safety Evaluation dated January 31, 1994. Local Public Document Room location: Richland Public Library, 955 Northgate Street, Richland, Washington 99352 Attorney for licensee: M. H. Philips, Jr., Esq., Winston & Strawn, 1400 L Street, N.W., Washington, D.C. 20005-3502. NRC Project Director: The odore R. Quay Dated at Rockville, Maryland, this For the Nuclear Regulatory Commission Robert A. Capra, Acting Director, Division of Reactor Projects -I/II, Office of Nuclear Reactor Regulation [Doc. 94-3465 Filed 2-15-94; 8:45 am] BILLING CODE 7590-01-F
